“No, no, that’s fine. Thanks a lot.”
Today is World Autism Awareness day. April is Autism Awareness month. I want MY autism community to RESPECTFULLY support however we EACH choose to promote and support OUR own autism. THAT is what makes us a true COMMUNITY.
New Year's eve is the time of year I like best. Not so commercial as Christmas yet just as full of indulgence and merriment. How wonderful it is that no matter how good, bad or indifferent your year has been this is the eve that allows you to take stock and move onwards, upwards or sideways. On this night of all nights the world is once more your oyster as with the an arbitrary click of the celestial wheel we shunt into another 365 day cycle. Had a bad year? Shrug it off with a grin and wink, down that champers and welcome on in 2011, hello you beautiful blank slate you, let's make plans. Your year was brimming with delight? Well then shout hurrah and so long you beauty, may the next 12 months be just as bountiful. Any which way you choose New Year's eve is a gift waiting to be unwrapped.
* Comfortable
A. Kathir, Executive Director of ‘Evidence,’ a human rights organisation, expressed concern over the increasing number of honour killings in Tamil Nadu. He sought suitable compensation to Elango’s family. Enquiry by a fact-finding team revealed that the murder was a clear case of honour killing, Mr. Kathir added.
I thought we had moved past all these colors until a few years ago when I was at a Pampered Chef Leadership conference (back when I was a director, before I stopped being a consultant and then started again). They showed us this new "fun color cutlery line." FUN color. FUN???? See for yourself:
So if I am missing, I am in action...
16. Gunfight at Red Sands (01:33)
Dunne, Anthony – Herzian Tales, The MIT Press, 2005.
You know that chain Italian restaurant with delicious salad and breadsticks? Well, they sell their dressing in a bottle - BUT I'm too cheap to buy it. However, I found a recipe claiming to be just like it and in fact, it was pretty close! I've made this recipe twice and barely tweaked it at all. I've used it on salad and pasta salad. I've served it to my neighbors, church friends and my family, every time it was a success.
Due to its sweetening propreties, HFCS is obviously found in sugary products like jams, soft drinks and pre-packaged baked goods. However, many people do not realize that it is also found in numerous other products, including soups, breads, pasta sauces, cereals, frozen entrees, meat products, salad dressings and condiments. HFCS is also found in so-called health products, including protein-bars, “low-fat” foods and energy drinks.
While I normally post this column on Sunday afternoon, this past Sunday found me sitting in the final performance of our local high school’s spring musical in which my oldest had a leading role.
In fact we have been riding them around for about 3 weeks.
I also enjoyed Will's growth from the bad boy into a sweet, caring husband. I liked that the sweetness was always there, it wasn't a 360 degree change in his character. The bad boy image turned out just to be a facade to keep people out of his life.
Mr Cameron’s first major speech on green issues for two years was welcomed by commentators in the energy sector.It was seen as riposte to Tory backbenchers who have complained about the growth of wind power in the UK, while reassuring those in his party who fear that the cost of renewables is too much.
The Wynn-Wynn Media vision was a combination of her love for good books and her understanding of all aspects of publishing, from acquisition to editorial to marketing to sales. The whole of her publishing experience has enhanced her abilities as a publicist. Jeane has spent over 20 years in Christian publishing. Her business partner is her husband Tyson Wynn, who holds a degree in English from Oklahoma State University. He works with her in the business as an editor, strategist, and administrator. Jeane is also an alumnus of Oklahoma State, with a degree in communications. Tyson and Jeane were raised in the same small town of Welch, Oklahoma.
Each planet hosts their winter celebrations at a different time, since all have their winter weather at different moments in planet orbits and tilts. There are a variety of holidays—religious days, days to honor people, days just for fun. Cultures merge into a mishmash of all kinds of ways of celebrating the season, from elaborate food to elegant rituals.
I want to be helpful, but i’m so flummoxed i can’t write anything that makes sense here, or in response to other folks blogs. I apologize if my comments are shitty. I’m not thinking clearly.
Overall it is a great game, we have a blast playing it and so far no one has been seriously injured...Ya...So far.
3. We dipped 6″ of Lauren’s ponytail into the lightest pink and squeezed it out over the sink.
In my real world job I get to work quite a bit with photographers, so I take an interest in what is - and isn't - a good image in an editorial context. A friend sent me an online lecture by the photo director for National Geographic, who's called David Griffin.
The chocolate and dart tart is gorgeously glossy with a super rich filling that is a balance of dark chocolate chocolate and cream. The tart shell is short and crisp and though the double cream is tempting, we don't end up eating much of it as the tart isn't overly sweet.
19. I love the moment between Jeffrey and Maude where they bond after having sex. It’s a nice, quiet and amusing scene as we take a break from all the crazy people The Dude encounters and learn that he was briefly a roadie for Metallica (“Bunch of assholes.”). He was also a member of the anti-war group the Seattle Seven and helped write the original Port Huron Statement – not the compromised second draft. The chemistry between Bridges and Julianne Moore is excellent and The Dude’s reaction to Maude’s true intentions for their sexual rendezvous is funny. Plus, she helps him free up his uptight thinking about the mystery he’s embroiled in.
1. Space colonists 09:32
A policeman was arrested for allegedly smuggling drugs to awaiting trial prisoners at the Vredendal Regional Court cells, Western Cape police said on Friday.
So. That's why there's been no movement on this blog (or my other blog on The Big Idea)... nothing's been happening! But we're back to the big smoke tomorrow, and I see the creative crowd are cranking up for the year, and a few deadlines are looming for me...
Part 4 of our theme of “Looking to Jesus”
"Everyone has embarrassing moments, " he said. "But I think once you put them out there it shows that you're human."
TIP: Use your students! Although many of us in education were taught and tend to believe that we know more than our students, when it comes to technology – teach, you better take a deep breath and step aside. I love the fact that some of my kids know more about certain apps and programs than I do because I have built-in help when I need it. Bigger picture, this can sometimes be scary for educators who always like to be in the driver’s seat. Perhaps it is my years of experience, perhaps it is the excitement I see in their eyes, but I relish in the fact that they can teach me a few things. And I bet they enjoy helping their teacher learn something new. Be open to the idea that this generation has always grown up with vastly superior technology than you ever had as a student…use them as a resource. You won’t be disappointed. And you are not giving up any power – you are empowering…one of the most satisfying and honorable things a teacher can do for a student.
He and I were both shocked at my supporters' response to his presence. One man screamed "Irishman!" (I think he thought Obama had an apostrophe between the 'O' and the 'b'), and another yelled "We don't need 'the troubles' here!" Yet another waved a sign that said "No potato eaters in the White House!"
A police man arrests a guy urinating in a corner where it was clearly written "Do not urinate here' fine:500"
Los Angeles, where lightning rarely strikes, is one of the few places Mia feels safe from her addiction. But when an earthquake devastates the city, her haven is transformed into a minefield of chaos and danger. The beaches become massive tent cities. Downtown is a crumbling wasteland, where a traveling party moves to a different empty building each night, the revelers drawn to the destruction by a force they cannot deny. Two warring cults rise to power, and both see Mia as the key to their opposing doomsday prophecies. They believe she has a connection to the freak electrical storm that caused the quake, and to the far more devastating storm that is yet to come.
We had a wonderful vacation in Indiana. The kids wore themselves out every day playing outside and with their grandparents. It was just a really sweet time away.
Region: Southern Sumatra, Indonesia
Play
Well... this is not at all what happened to me in my second semester of second year (this time last year). In fact, the exact opposite happened. What on Earth does this have to do with writing, you ask? You’ll see, in due time.
This didn’t concern me two years ago, though. (And clearly, not now, either…)
As Ghandi said, 'an eye for an eye ends up making the whole world blind'.
The problem with this is that most smartphone users don’t pay enough attention to the permissions they are granting apps they download to their smartphones and tablets. Even the best known apps request permission to access and upload your contacts, email and text messages.
The dancing on the dashboard gets faster. The trees here are taller, straighter, and the sunlight strobes through the branches. My breath catches and a sudden heaviness pushes me deep into the seat.
At least the album is “Floydian” in its presentation. He uses most of the supporting players from The Final Cut, with the key additions of Eric Clapton (for a Strat tone, and a thumb of the nose to David Gilmour) and David Sanborn, whose squawking sax underscores his discomfort anytime thinks get dark. He took Clapton on the road to present the album and key songs from his past in a multimedia extravaganza. But ultimately, The Pros And Cons Of Hitch Hiking is just plain uncomfortable, leaving the listener in a bad mood and likely to lash out at unsuspecting friends and family. And if anyone can explain what exactly those pros and cons are, we’d love to know.
Had a jacket potato for tea after clearing around the microwave area and scrubbing the microwave clean as it could get, Mr N hovered, madam E tidied her bedroom as she hates the hoovers noise and the son was at school practising for a food culinary competition by cooking some lovely mixed veg in a brown bread (he made that too) surround, brought it home, it were right tasty, nice one son!
Those who must take their cases to court want or need something that their soon-to-be ex will not agree to give them. Since they are unable to persuade their partner to agree to a mutually acceptable compromise, they have no alternative but to ask that a judge determine who will give or get what.
Paper - DCWV Sweet Stack, Me and My Big Ideas, stash
Still, LOTRO aside, there were many Good Things about Guild Wars 2. There were a few Bad Things. There were even one Not Ugly Enough Thing. And so, Ladies and gentlebumps, I present to you in no particular order *drum roll please* my list of stuff I liked and stuffs I didn’t. Oh yes.
Let’s break down the scripture a bit. Jesus invites us to “come” meaning we have to act on our part. Jesus always invites, but so often we can be so stubborn and not “go” to Him. Jesus is not gonna drag us… going to Him, needs to be our choice.
Again back to that tolerance/ acceptance/ questioning thing.
Some are Spanish style with ironwork in the windows and red tile roof tops.
TV host: I agree, but what should she do? Should she divorce him?
She's pretty awesome!!
No one will come to visit my tomb. Then, I am better off buried along the road,
Sooooo if you have crazy-mind-of-its-own hair like mine - try this stuff! You won't be sorry, I promise.
Click over to our events page to see all the other things happening this week, see you in the streets, and since its just clicked over to midnight happy international workers day everyone!
and april has brought life back into full swing.
Yet though most people will have heard of autism, few truly understand what having the condition means.
2 T peanut butter
These are, for me what makes a film good. You may disagree completely or be thinking ‘Yes, this woman/cat thing knows what she’s on about’. If it’s the latter then I’m so giving you hugs right now, look I’ll even retract the claws too. Either way I hop you’ve enjoyed this and please do feel free to comment on this posting.
The birds jocoser sung;
12. Thunder
Separate all but a small amount of the stock from the fat. Add water if necessary to bring it up to 2 cups.
As I thought back to my childhood, I was always aware of Black History Month. This was the one month out of the year when I was forced to do book reports every week, learn Negro Spirituals and Poems, watch film rolls about slavery and segregation and even go to the Smithsonian or the Blacks in Wax Museum.
Yarn Over hook and insert into same stitch,Yarn Over hook pull up a loop,
We want to increase and improve the genetic quality of the human race by purging the garbage from the system.
Israel can be proud that it fosters a culture which is willing to be that self-reflective, unafraid to look at itself, warts and all, and in the process produce such transcendent works of art.
These are the spring cabbages. We call them Ul-ga-ree (얼갈이).
Thanks for stopping by until next time I hope the Lord bless and keeps you.
I love this little owl wreath from Love People Like Things and although she calls it a fall wreath, I think you could get away with it in the in between seasons like now too!
At one point Bloom offers this blunt evaluation, clearly intended as a put-down:I've lived in many places, lots of them foreign countries, but none has been more foreign to me than Iowa.In subsequent paragraphs Bloom cites an overabundance of Germanic surnames and Christian beliefs as a particular source of irritation.
resonant of that old big
It has, however, been whispered in certain circles that Morgenstern himself is a figment of Goldman’s ultra-fertile imagination. Read Goldman’s original and special Anniversary introductions and make up your own mind. Completely delightful, suitable for cynics and romantics alike. Suspension of disbelief optional.
Seth and his brother Conal are not immortals but are immensely long-lived and have now arrived in the 21st century in our world. They are searching for the bloodstone, an apparently impossible task set by Kate NicNiven, the Queen of the Sithe, and have been doing it for centuries. But Seth is still a teenager with an admired older (half)-brother.
Here’s Alexander the Great on his return journey WITHOUT the Golden Feather from the Golden Bird called India.(Sorry about the color of the web-page – I’d have preferred Golden, but who listens to me…sniff!)
So, now I am slowly attempting to get all of my old designs onto the computer so that I can
This is a sweet book that I thoroughly enjoyed. This is an easy read, not complicated - great book to lift the spirits. I carried the book with me wherever I went.
Have been wanting to do a scratch-art lesson for ages, and finally tried it. My high school students enjoyed it a lot. I got the idea of starting with a face from Nena at The Painted Apple. Her students create marvelous work and I'm so glad she shares it in her blog!
But those questions generate different questions: Should I have stayed twice the size my body is meant to be? Should I have gone all my life without hitting puberty? Wasn’t that self-assurance just my conscious naiveté?
While I sat on my dining room table , drawing, cutting and painting, I watched the September Issue on Netflix again. Although Anna Wintour’s reputation precedes her, I find her to be an admirable woman, someone who works hard and expects nothing less than excellence. It was great to see all the hard work that goes into creating a great editorial, Grace Coddington is a genius and no one expects to produce the kind of pictures she does but still, I feel that hard work pays off and I felt truly inspired.
The four week moving average of the Investors Intelligence bull ratio (bullish % divided by the decideds) is still tracking downwards without having reached levels that have previously matched market bottoms. This is mainly because unlike other major corrections the number of bears didn’t rise above 28%. Normally we see 35-40% bears at intermediate market lows.
I stopped, turned...
Yet a bright deep true red was difficult to obtain, and for painters and dyers that made it all the more valuable. The best dye, though, was derived from the cochineal beetle native to what was, at the time, the Aztec Empire.
270 7. “On the Sacred and the Profane: The Flag Desecration Amendment.” Congressional Record, October 18, 1995, pp. E1965-E1967. (Entered by Representative Andrew Jacobs, Jr.) (Source: Item D-IX/17/1995, below.)
John 6:39 And this is the Father’s will which hath sent me, that of all which he hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up again at the last day.
The guy: had a cleft lip that was badly fixed. Black teeth. A large plastic bottle in to which he spit tobacco constantly. (I wonder how come THAT was not confiscated at security? Talk about toxic chemicals!). Raggedy beard and hair. Truckers cap and matching t shirt. Kept mumbling and talking to complete strangers, like me. (Yes, I was one of the ones who moved as well.)
Lawyer Zola Majavu said the accused was having experiences he had never had before.
My favorite photography destination is Tuscany. There are so many things to love about shooting there. Several of the key elements are the special quality of the light, the amazingly sensual forms of the landscape, the incredible colors, and the sense of space. Well, if we define photography as “light on forms in space” and color photography as that, plus color, then I think that just about sums it up.
…UPPER OH VALLEY…
Of lust,
This is what the counter looks like when my teenagers cook their own lunch. Upside? Cooking for self is a life skill. Next step? Cleanup is part of "playing" and cooking!!
In the locker room, Natalie tells Brenda that she knew Michelle, but that they hadn't spoken in 2 years. She then decides to tell Brenda the whole story of the incident in her past. See, she and Michelle were out in Nat's car one night, when Michelle decided to try out the "high beams" initiation urban legend for herself. She waited for a car to come along and flash the headlights at them, then she began to chase the other driver. The other driver freaked out and crashed by the side of the road, which killed him. The court decided that their role in the accident wasn't enough proof to charge them, so Nat and Michelle were given probation instead.
On the return trip, there was, I swear to goodness, the most beautiful moon I have ever seen in my life. Full yet halved, so close and yet so orange, it was haunting and beautiful and perfect in the moment. I, of course, took approximately 1000 pictures, Dan was kind enough to let me do so.
We (the Armstrong actually) were towing the caravan
And (following my head, not my heart)
So now it's your turn...don't forget to make sure that your project follows the challenge, 'J is for Joy Fold Card', and as always has a Christmas theme.
Entries for North East Open Studios (NEOS) 2012 may have just closed but VSA, the UK’s largest city social care charity supporting people in Aberdeen and Aberdeenshire, has announced it has space to accommodate further artists and creators at its annual NEOS event at Easter Anguston Farm, Peterculter.
We hurried along the 500m or so to the gate and boarded the plane straight away. Settling ourselves into our seats I suddenly realised we were one bag short – Luca had left Mateo’s rucksack in the restaurant.
One step at a time.
Yes, there is light at the end of the tunnel no matter how things look in this life. But that light is the Lord Jesus Christ and He is at the right hand of the Father in heaven. Now, we are seated with Him in heavenly places according to Ephesians 2:6. We are to recognize that exalted position in Christ and the fuller implications of it. What does it mean to be in Christ?
Early morning, we set out again. The road was becoming a winding hilly tract and after about an hour of ride we reached the detour that goes to the waterfalls.
Why vote “yes”
Your application needs to cover the following points.
Now 64yrs old, Elton John is still going strong. His most recent Album, “The Union“, in collaboration with Leon Russell, was released in 2010.
Commander-in-Chief, U.S. Pacific Fleet (’82-‘85)
In January, Dad got much weaker. He fell, had trouble breathing, landed in the hospital, was told he had pneumonia and colon cancer, and then congestive heart failure. We understood, if he didn't, that the colon cancer would not be the thing that killed him. I began driving up every Tuesday afternoon, spending several hours with him wherever he was...at the hospital, in their assisted living apartment, and for the last couple of months in the nursing home just upstairs from the apartment. I got to know their friends and the cheerful, caring, overworked staff. I pushed his wheelchair to the big glass finch cage, or outside for a breath of air, or to the dining room for malts or cookies (Tuesday afternoon at 3:30 is snack time; I'm no dummy). I saw how everyone greeted him and wished him well. I saw how he kept his sense of humor, even when he was clearly not feeling well. I rubbed his back, and I set him up with an iPod Shuffle onto which I'd loaded Sinatra, Perry Como, Tommy Dorsey, Ella Fitzgerald, and the like. Gradually he spent fewer hours awake and lucid, and by yesterday afternoon he was incommunicado, lulled by Ativan and Bing Crosby.
So right now I am drinking a lot of infusions. Every day I drink nettle and most days I drink oatstraw as well. Once a month I drink sarsparilla for a week and I throw in raspberry leaf and red clover, too and an occasional pot of yarrow tea. So every day I am drinking 3 cups of infusions. The hormonal shifts of menopause are as demanding on the endocrine system as adolescence and your glands need a lot of nourishment. These infusions are high in so many nutrients that I take no other supplements.
Baking soda -/12 teaspoon
someone who can be gentle with me
The farm does therapeutic riding, and so far it seems like stuff is generally well under control. The farm manager had Joey in hand by the time I made it down the hill. I explained what happened, and she pointed out that my face was bleeding. My glasses had cut the side of my nose.
He said another newspaper had published comments which he had asked not to be made public.
Sentencing for Herron was not immediately scheduled. The charge of second-degree animal cruelty is a Class A misdemeanor, punishable by up to one year in jail with fines up to $6,000.
*Maybe* he has watched a little too much Bomb Patrol. *Maybe*, as in, he chose a canteen to attach to his hip with a carabiner from the army surplus store today, on his boys day with Daddy, rather than a toy.
Ed is shocked that the cliffhangers don't match. I explain that the resolutions were re-shot in the next batch of filming. He maintains that the animal skins on the bed are different.
02. Croque Monsieur
“I’m sure the laddies and lasses ‘ill ask more questions about the Light next time, eh?”
Facebook has changed this to a Like button[1] that does a lot more, and introduced the Open Graph[2] protocol, which is a fancy way of saying a standardized method for members of one site can share their experiences, enthusiasms and recommendations on another site. The site that offers the button can set up a lasting connection between the member’s experience on the site and their Facebook experience.
whole punch
I'm sure they'll be happy to see it again when the storage is all unpacked, but they've been pretty content with what we've got here. It actually kind of seems like they play with their toys more now that they have fewer to choose from.
I’ve been pretty MIA and I just was either too weary to write or I didn't know what to write about. But here I am, I’m pretty excited cause I found out my blog was page ranked by Google and I’m now a 2! its better than a nothing. So that was an exciting thing and it inspired me to write about life.
email me at houseofhemingway@gmail.com
I’m going to publish this novel. That’s right. Game on.
It is absurd to build up economic life on the conceptions of achievement, of the value of personality, and therefore in practice on the authority of personality, but in the political sphere to deny the authority of personality and to thrust into its place the law of the greater number - Democracy.
A few days after we get back we are planning on taking the new camper for her maiden voyage (to us) down to our favorite home educators camp for a week. Love hanging out with other school-free families and playing at the amazing park across the road from the campsite. Tannah is getting big enough now that I imagine she will be off with her friends on their scooters a lot of the time.
Once you're there, you can now make changes by either selecting a custom colour, or by adding in a background image.
The vehicle was later found in a subway on Lakeside Drive, Northampton at around 5.15am.” The offender was white, aged in his early twenties, 6ft and with broad shoulders and a thin waist. He was wearing a black tracksuit with the hood up.
Dave, 20.41. Dave, I just don’t believe you are self employed. You would know a lot more about exactly what taxes have to be payed when you are a company director. You’ve exposed your ‘inexactitudes’ with your inaccurate post.
People have had a gut full of half-hearted consultation and that was evident tonight with the lack of people attending and the mood of the meeting at times.
Use unit studies....teach them all the same topic at the same, but at different levels.
That’s all I could think when he looked at me under his glasses, the kind with the thin wire frames. They were glasses you’d see on a general manager at Burger King. They didn’t match his pressed suit or his neatly combed hair. But that wasn’t it.
My office moved a few meters eastwards today.
According to the Registrar,
In 35% of villages, Dalit producers are still barred from selling their produce in local markets. Instead, they are forced to sell it in the anonymity of distant urban markets where caste identities somewhat blur, imposing additional burdens of costs and time, and reducing their profit margin and competitiveness.
I’m telling you, Blog, it’s the simple things. It’s always the simple things.
I started off Jr. High in my new town with a bang. And speaking of bangs, I’m pretty sure I got a hold of the kitchen sheers and tried to trim those bitches the night before the first day. School pictures were not something my parents purchased that year. Just sayin’.
Got another great idea for another series from a sweet woman that works at the Little Gallery at Smith Mountain Lake ! Love series !! Last week I delivered new work to the gallery, so if you're in that area of Virginia, stop at the Little Gallery-it's a lovely place with a boat load of great art and jewelry and sculpture. And then go fishing.
Matthew D. Horning, 26, Hoboken, N.J.
Prods I Use now
I’ll concede there are exceptions, but have you any idea how many high street stores stock gold G-strings or lace trimmed Gingham tangas for men? And should your male peers discover you’re dressing off piste, you can expect to never live it down. The most famous UK exponent of the male thong is the eponymous proprietor of Stringfellow’s lap dancing clubs, Peter Stringfellow. This infamous holiday snap found it’s way into the mainstream media, and he has been vilified regularly on TV shows ever since.
Steven kept pushing for a babysitter for a night out. That sounded great, as I was starting to get punchy after nearly a month of me and baby 24/7. I love him, but I need a break once in a while. However, I said there was no way I was letting a teenager in to watch him while the house wasn't safe (again, those boxes everywhere). So, Steven started moving some stuff out of the living room that we knew we wouldn't get to for a little while (like all the boxes of pictures for the walls). Then, when friends came into town for the weekend, they pitched in to get the living room unpacked. I deemed the room safe enough for me to feel comfortable leaving Alex with someone while we all went out.
Then silence broke with more ululations and heavy applause. Mr. Think- who may had considered gratuitous socialization a waste of time and had concentrated on his work instead- was however always welcome when he attended an event like this.
around Sylvia Lake, I rest on a bench
~ Spoon into 3.5oz (cupcakes) cups and bake at 180'C for 15-20 minutes. Makes 10 cupcakes.
I had kinda forgotten how hard this baby stuff is.
Beard hair is quite different to head hair; it is coarser, curlier and doesn’t fall out as we get older. Comparatively little work has been done on the genetics of human hair colour, but it is believed that in order to have a ginger beard you must be a carrier for the recessive gene on chromosome 4. With two copies of this gene you will have ginger hair all over, but with just one, the hair on your head will be brown or auburn and your beard will be ginger.
Cut flower basket arrangements are popular for Mother’s Day- this green wash basket includes roses, orchids and spider mums. We like the subtle green and peach colourways.
DAP’s Boo Is All Talk – Monday, 05 March 2012 13:43 – Tee Siew Kiong
Conway – Tony McQuay, this year’s National champion.
I suppose it could be worse. She could have spelled it with a K.
With the influence of Venus here, there is definitely such thing as too sober, serious, pragmatic, number-crunching, and dry. Love, beauty, and romance need to be worked into the mix. However, it's a person with solid integrity, with some financial savvy, with a nose for legitimate advancement, with expertly handled personal responsibilities, and with the ability to dig in and get the job done even if it means defering personal pleasures who is most attractive under these astro energies.
Doonesbury is meant to be provocative, political, and satirical, something you surely realize in carrying the strip. Many papers place it in the opinion section for this very reason. There is an argument to be made, I think, about not carrying Thursday’s strip in the comics sections, given the concluding line about rape. Many people believe that rape should never be a punchline. There is legitimate debate to be had about whether its use in this instance is inappropriately meant to be “funny” or is simply a reflection many women’s expressed perspective – that being forced to have an object inserted in one’s vagina for non-medical purposes to serve the agendas of anti-abortion politicians is indeed a form of rape or assault.
See then how circumspectly you walk, not as unwise but as wise, redeeming the time, because the days evil are. Through this not become unthinking, but understand what the will of the Lord. And not be drunk in wine, in which is dissipation, but be filled in spirit, speaking to yourselves in psalms and hymns and songs spiritual, singing and psalming in the heart of you to the Lord, giving thanks always on behalf of all in the name of the Lord of us Jesus Christ to the God and father. Being subject to one another in fear of Christ. (Ephesians 5:15-21 a word-for-word translation from Koine Greek to English)
- The IGP is a pure, unadulterated, garden variety moron. He said rather sulkily yesterday on TV of the protesters, ”Dia bukan jerit Bersih. Dia jerit Refomasi.” His bosses probably didn’t tell him that the whole Bersih rally was about Electoral REFORM.
I finished one of the quilts I have been making for a layer cake workshop, which is now hanging in the shop. I have quilted it by hand, it just seemed easier, and with the cold nights it was very cosy. I find quilting by hand very theraputic, and it stops me from falling asleep watching the rubbish on the television. There is a red border which you obviously can`t see which is a pity because it really finishes it off. I feel it needs more quilting, and will probably do some more at a later date. I loved the layer cake it was called Ruby by Moda.
Thank you, Android.
I walked in the door and Debbie looked me up and down. I felt like Anne Hathaway in the Devil wears Prada, meeting Miranda Priestley for the first time.
Jim Greene and Wolf play original tunes influenced by writers such as John Prine, Jackson Browne and John Hiatt.
She moved away, went to university to study forensic science. He stayed behind, studied at his local college. He found it difficult not talking to her every day. The two tried to stay in touch but over the years like all things they grew apart.
Are they committing a crime?
Sad to say that Ferrer does little as the main villain - how much can you do when lying in an iron lung? He's a great actor, but being funny in a huge metal tube is hard to do; safe to say that he almost gets away with it.
Hello Lovelies, this week I have been lucky enough to get the half term off to spend relaxing with my boys. The weather has mostly been great .....sunny with blue skys and we have been making the most of our time off. There has been bike riding with lots of photo stops for me . .......
I can feel his warm staggered breath against my ear before I hear him, “You know, I’ve always loved you; I never stopped loving you.”
So 189 flowers all together.
AfriForum Youth has directed several letters on the matter to the rector, Prof Cheryl de la Rey, and the Minister of Higher Education, Dr Blade Nzimande. "Although the Department indicated before that the rector will be required to submit a report on the situation, such a report has not been released yet," the grouping said. "Moreover, in terms of the application for information, AfriForum Youth is still awaiting the academic records of the applicants who gained entry to the Veterinary Science Faculty and the pass rate in respect of each category for the past three years." http://bit.ly/wDDrNS
The size of a shoelace.
Lucky for me I had the camera. There were other people with cameras but I didn't ask for copies of any of their pictures. I am just hoping to not see myself on youtube. It was special.
Despite the steep prices (for what they deliver) there is no waitress service at Taylor's. Pick up one of their huge menus and peruse it as fast as you can before you reach the front of the queue. On this occasion there was no line at all, causing our decisions to be more hurried than they might have been. For example, we didn't notice that fries weren't included with the burgers. This is one place where I might actually have liked the server to enquire "Would you like some fries with that?". Once you have paid, you are given a strange device (pictured above), that will bleep and flash at you, in irksome fashion, once your meal is ready to be picked up from the counter.
¡Tu eres loco!” she yelled at him.
There is a new challenge over at Critter Sketch Challenge Blog and this week it’s a sketch.
Barack Obama with his mother Ann Dunham
and had sex with her
You can buy them or see if they have the books at a library nearby. So you know if you like the books or not and don’t just go and buy the books and then you don’t like them and you’ll have wasted all that money on something you don’t like..
For example, with reducing the use of pesticides, the farmer is motivated by lower input costs, and the consumer is motivated by reducing potential health dangers. Also, a farmer is motivated to take better care of animals and land because it protects the farmer’s greatest financial investment, while consumers believe it is simply the right thing to do.
The design of the dessert table was a geometric diamond motif, and was largely inspired by a rug pattern. I always say that you can take your inspiration from anywhere! We thought that bold colors like bright pink and yellow would complement the pattern.
As Bill Gaytten has temporarily replaced John Galliano as the new designer, Dior is still searching for a head designer, who will be the new “face” of Dior. However, Dior’s Haute Couture Spring 2012 collection, created by Bill Gaytten has definitely proven himself worthy. The biggest question now is, does Dior need a well-known designer to replace John Galliano?
What is stopping your organization from creating the kind of work environment where you are in control of your time? What is stopping your organization from allowing you to use the tools and the gear that you know work best for you?
Francesco goes on a killing spree, first of all knocking off a load of obnoxious young people. Then while driving around two students ask him for a lift and one of them is She as yet another woman. He takes them back to their flat and Francesco falls in love with She again and they have sex. It is only later he discovers that She and her friend are prostitutes. He starts a fire and leaves ignoring the screams and cries of the women.
Perhaps further visits will elucidate the mysteries of Shoeburyness.
this is how things get started;
Since it was just we two - no cake, flowers, or decorations with which to get creative and add meaning—we added personal touches where we could. We chose two outfits for the day: one more formal and traditional for the wedding ceremony, one more spirited and for our “man and wife about town” afternoon. It was pure luck that I found a vintage 1940 sweetheart locket already engraved with “LM” on front. I also wore my grandmother’s 25th wedding anniversary ring. We brought a celebratory cigar & clove with us to light up for the photos. We chose the 8/9/10 date because it felt sort of whimsical and fun to say, since we’ll be saying it forever. Our photographer came back to the hotel with us while we changed so we could take a few photos in the lobby. We stayed at the very cool Hotel Vertigo; now a refurbished old hotel, its unmistakable dizzying staircase was featured in the movie. In the few days we were in the city, we rented a Vespa for a day, went to the Conservatory of Flowers, Chinatown, and a great deep dish pizza place called Little Star with my brother and his girlfriend the night after the wedding. After SF, we spent a couple days driving down the coast on a mini honeymoon. Scenic but phew, quite a drive. We picked up many coffees-to-go along the way!
12.) He makes the little moments of ordinary days feel special. Grocery shopping, yard work, making dinner together or curling up on the sofa to watch a movie. None of these are particularly special on their own, but somehow doing them together makes them feel that way. Twelve years of these moments, one piled on top of the other, adds up to a happy marriage.
Kang: All right, then. No abortions for anyone!
12 Rainbow Bridge 6:18
I can see, though, the temptation, and fear, in being a cork. I had never had anyone care for me so, and the warmth of that love, and the security of someone else helping me navigate this storm, was….indescribable. To not be so completely, alone.
3. Hands that shed innocent blood. In dance I see this more as the act of self-flagellation. The act of severely criticizing oneself. It’s impossible to not go through periods of this. There are times when I’m so tired from practice that I can’t think straight and the person I take it out on is me. “I’m a terrible dancer, why am I here? I’ve wrapped my entire identity up in this world and for what? All the money all the time and for what?” These thoughts are going to creep in no matter who you are. Last night I felt them and they ate away at my sleep. Today I feel better but I can still feel the scars they left behind.
The problem here is that if you want to use this as a metaphor, you have to start with something that isn't just plain wrong. Metaphors are "wrong" but illuminating. Calling an agent a shark for example, does not mean you'd wax enthusiastic about swimming as a necessary skill for reading queries.
It was also the fall of that year that my dad was sent to prison. Moonshining did not carry a heavy penalty but it was a criminal act to not pay taxes on his sales, so my dad was sentenced to six months in a minimum security facility. Six months of his life meant six months away from his wife and three little girls, of which I was the oldest at the age of nine.
Meanwhile I was off to work at a church. Not just any church, mind you. A church filled with Believers, including a family I met when I was 8 years old. A family who's chance meeting led to my career as an ASL interpreter; a family who's faith inspired me deeply and wholly through my life. A family who asked me how I was and anticipated an honest answer. So I gave them one: I am done, spent, empty. I cannot carry this burden one more day. So we prayed, the whole of the congregation prayed my honesttogod prayer with me: Let it end. Soon.
Problem being my phone is out of alarms. I have filled them all. I have to prioritize. When something new comes up I have to erase some other alarm to replace it with the new thing. I don't have enough alarms to remind me when book reports are due for 4 kids or when this homework or that assignment needs to be turned in. In fact I forgot to register Olivia for school today because I had no more room in my calendar. That and I failed to read the email of instructions completely. Oops.
Frith, Simon & Howard Horne (1987) Art into pop London/New York: Routledge.
Brandon Holstein: What was your favorite NFL team and player growing up and why?
A character literal is expressed in a Java program with single quotes, such as ‘b’ or ‘J’ or ‘;’. You will recall that string literals are delineated using double quotation marks…
And of course, I have to talk a bit more about Anna and Kai. I knew they were going to be special from the moment I first saw this cover. When it arrived, I held it close, and couldn't wait to start it; shortly after beginning Sweet Evil, I was deeply involved in Anna and Kaidan's story. Kai is tormented, and Anna is incredibly drawn to him, but make no mistake - this isn't insta-love. This is organic, and this is real - they are a simmer, a growing flame, an attraction that builds throughout the course of Sweet Evil. As often as I fell for them, I was frustrated because of what they were going through, and I will say that they felt totally real, and I was RIGHT THERE with both of them, especially seeing things through Anna's eyes. Wendy Higgins really brought their tension and their yearning for one another to life so well, so achingly truthfully. What I loved is that we get to see Anna fall in love, but because of her situation, it isn't strictly the happy first love - it's something more, something infinitely more complicated and fragile. It's as harrowing as it is renewing, and the growth that Anna experiences through her relationship with Kai and because of everything happening to and around her is both encouraging and bittersweet.
Piped-in subliminal slogans.
DiS: I have to ask you about a blog that appeared on your website a while back, Homage Or Fromage, which kind of named and shamed numerous television commercials where unauthorised copying of your music had taken place. It seemed to center largely around variations of 'Hoppipolla' which had been used to advertise all sorts of products. Have you spotted any more recently and has there ever been a time where you've been forced to pursue legal action against one of the perpetrators?
Add in cocoa powder and chocolate paste. Mix well.
This past weekend, the DFWCG hosted a little tea party with the theme of Tokyo Pop. This could mean anything from traditional kimonos, to anime, to Harajuku street fashions. Anime/cosplay is not really my thing, and I don't own a kimono, so I poked around some Harajuku websites and discovered mori girl fashions. I think I've been a closet mori girl my entire life and didn't even know it! Mori girls are supposed to look like they came from an enchanted forest. This aesthetic has lots of loose layers, pale neutral colors, and details taken from nature. As much as I love dressing up in well tailored dressy dresses, I'm more of a laid back hippie in real life, so this suited me quite perfectly.
disarmed with beauty
“I will get myself healthier.”
I moved to Cleveland in July. I began to learn that not all neighborhoods were car jack territory, and that my neighborhood was quite safe.
Not through feng shui.
To date, the duo has released 10 Studio Albums in their career.
Into the storm
We had orzo pasta salad with asparagus and artichokes served in individual mason jars. I found this recipe a while back on this blog and I make it all the time now, love it!
1030am-3 scrambled eggs, 4 slices bacon, sausage, tomato, 1/2 cup grits
At least that's my excuse.
I've found if you heat a tablespoon of peanut butter in the microwave for about 15ish seconds, it melts into more of a syrup. So cut the banana into bites and dip it into the peanut butter. You end up eating considerably less peanut butter per bite of banana, and your body doesn't know the difference. It just knows it's eating a bite of banana that is absolutely smothered in peanut butter. Win-win.
Oh, and just so I can settle this: a zombie plague stops at the hospital. Zombies are clearly out of their minds, would arrive restrained, and would remain restrained. Zombies can’t escape from full hospital bed restraints without injuring themselves to the point of incapacitation. People who haven’t turned yet will get treated, inspected, etc., and even if there is no cure and the hospital doesn’t know what’s going on, they aren’t going to let somebody attacked in this way walk, most likely. They *might* (people *are* stupid), but even in that case we’re dealing with dozens or scores of zombies, all told, not *everyone*.
When were you happiest?
If you think a $20 ticket for swearing seems stiff, consider the fine some townspeople told me they’d prefer to see levied: $100 per curse.
On our way home I had to do A LOT of halting, backing, etc, to try and get Prince to stop jigging. Eventually he invented his own new gait in which he walked up front and sort of half jigged behind. Annoying to ride, but I think in a few more rides he'll settle down and behave better.
Roll of pie dough (Need 2 to use the whole can of filling.)
Here are the Daily Getaways offers for April 23 – 27:
Martha Stewart leave punch
Everything was as Beth described in her Etsy listings. I immediately set up some vignettes to show off my finds:
So a few weeks ago– the evening of the Easter Vigil, as a matter of fact– I prayed that I would know who to talk to, that it would be really obvious.
So never can you out think me.
If you are on Twitter follow us @sfts1
The good: her motor sounds fantastic -- strong and quiet -- and when I run her with no thread she's smooth as can be. I'll need to tighten up that hook (I might disassemble the shuttle race first) and take it from there.
If you DO agree to work on a project (as a gift) for someone, for free, be sure to let them know how much it will cost next time. This will also help you in the matter of other people seeing your work from this person and making inquiries in regards to it. It also doesn’t hurt to inform people just how valuable your time really is. Maybe they’ll think twice before asking again.
told daddy to tell mommy not to go yet. I need her
Want More?
You are building a new body as well. Scientists know that our bodies replace every single cell every seven years. What we are experiencing NOW is an accelerated rate of this cellular regeneration of our physical and light bodies. It is going to be a whole new way to BE. It is going to feel a little strange for some time as this process completes, and we don’t expect this intensity to lighten up any time soon. A lot will be coming up; old stuff and more recent regurgitations.
I believe it takes a certain kind of person with a certain kind of passion to be an archaeologist. Just the sheer amount of red tape one must cut through to be able to wield a mere shovel anywhere there’s a government is enough to make most people say “Forget this. I’ll just sate my appetite for archaeology and adventure by watching Indiana Jones movies in my cubicle. (I’ll definitely skip that last one, though.)”
In the past few weeks:
A source informs me that Katie Leach’s Campaign Manager was overheard boasting about putting Rebecca Blackwood in the School Board District 3 race to split the Democratic vote.
Dance me to the end of love
Trade 4: Hamels and Bryan LaHair for Joey Votto, Kenley Jansen and J.D. Martinez
Walk love, walk love
(hb; 1995)
My teacher came up the stage, she took my hand, and we both went down from the stage.
Canvas and acrylic paint from Dunelm Mill
our predictions. This is quite advanced in the dairy industry, but less
To make this card, you first have to create a base using
But the thing I remember most was that first scoop of egg on my spoon. Up until that moment, my mum’s insistence on runny eggs had incensed my brother and I; we wanted them as hard as ping-pong balls, rubbery if possible. Absolutely nothing must be moving within. But this was different – there was a faint sweetness on the tongue that salt only seemed to intensify. The texture was soft and yielding with the merest bite to it. To my mind the yolk was (still is) unthinkable without the white. They belong together and here it proved most true. Toast was almost redundant; the white tenderly curled itself around each spoonful of plump, yellow yolk. Everyone was quiet for a time – there was only the sound of muffled cutlery, the crunch of crust and crackly shell.
(For the Children. It originally had a tune.)
Vanuni SO. On some indices of a chemical composition of breast milk of working mothers and women living in the area of synthetic rubber factory. ZH Exsp Klin Med 1972; 13: 111.
We’ve become excited by a flawless 2008 article published by Donald D. Hoffman, professor of cognitive sciences at the University of California Irvine. It’s called “Conscious Realism and the Mind-Body Problem” , and its aim is to show, using logic, philosophy, and neuroscience that we are not our brains. We are “conscious agents,” Hoffman’s term for minds that shape reality, including the reality of the brain. Hoffman is optimistic that the thorny problem of consciousness can be solved, and science can find a testable model for the mind. But future progress depends on researchers abandoning their current premise, that the brain is the mind. We urge you to read the article in its entirety, but for us, the good news is that Hoffman’s ideas show that the tide may be turning.
Throughout the day, as the other GAs and I sat in our classroom (which just so happens to also be an underground bomb shelter), I kept hearing rumblings. I have become accustomed to the random test bombings of the nearby IDF base. Usually, a few bombs every few days. But yesterday they sounded different. I had to ask two or three times, “Was that a bomb?” It was interesting to note the number of different responses: “No, its just the wind blowing down the stairwell.” “No, it’s probably someone working outside.” Almost always a “No, …”
For those of you who are more ambitious in your holiday fashions, try a little black dress with cutouts. MillionLooks reported that the cutout craze is just beginning. So be one of the first to wear the trend during the holidays. Cutouts add instant sex appeal to an outfit. Here again, I have to caution you. Don’t over do it with multiple cutouts, and make sure that they are in tasteful locations.
15. Disappear
I don’t know. I definitely have an addictive personality.
Diane, “I think ‘T’ insinuating that is your reason for wondering if you should or ‘want’ to continue therapy frankly is self-interest…to me if I was ‘T’ I would think that if you were having such thoughts then I would say that you should do what you think is right for you to do. Why complicate something that seems straightforward?”
Before their joy was drawn
The e-book is different, but it is not an advance. It is not poised to replace the book because, I believe, there is an irreplaceably aesthetic quality, an historical quality, and a mandate of contemplative thought embedded in printed books. And as our world becomes increasingly digitized, it becomes increasingly imperative that we seize upon the value of real things—real friends, real relationships, and real books. Will the e-book play an important part in the future of information? Sure—the microwave, synthesizer, and (perhaps) even auto-tune will remain part of the toolkits of kitchens, bands and singers. It will be in some ways a practical and useful tool. But let us not listen to the rhetoric that would have us think it is a tool that replaces all the other tools, like the infomercial that promises to provide you with the last tool you’ll ever need. So turn off your computer (or at least go into another room), sit in a comfy chair, get yourself a cup of tea and pick up a book. Feel its weight in your hand. Consider, for a moment, the craft that was employed to make it. Run your finger down the spine of the book. Open, take a deep whiff, and then embark on the unforgettable journey that begins on that first, glorious page.
I did get a great distraction from all of this today. My best friend in the world, Mindy, had her twin boys today, and I got to be there! They are healthy and precious! I'm a proud auntie! And I couldn't be more happy for anyone. My head has been spinning the last couple of days! So much going on. Never a dull moment! But I'll be happy when we at least get back to "normal-crazy" life.
Where to begin? It must be with the trip that inspired it all. A cruise across the Atlantic Ocean. We’ve had many amazing trips, more than I deserve; I feel like one of the luckiest people on the planet to have seen so much of the world, and to have a fantastic husband to share it with. But about that cruise. Billy and I joined the ship in Barbados and sailed to Lisbon, with a few wonderful stops along the way. But the real magic was our days at sea and the people we met, in particular Ms Gaelle Parks, who declared to me as we had breakfast at the stunning Lapa Palace in Lisbon, “You need to start a travel blog!” So I did.
Iweala, the Minister of Finance in Nigeria, speaks with authority & certainty. With no visual aids, nothing distracted from her powerful story of an Africa many believe cannot exist. An Africa where the tolerance for corruption & government mismanagement is coming to an end. An Africa that is a viable market for international investors & private enterprise. (view speech here) She was unflappable. Her strength concealed how fragile the vision is... whisper a breath on it & it dissolves.
I wrote early in the year about my daily art project for 2012: every day I hand-stitch a design onto a four-inch square of solid-color cotton. A third of the way through the year already, and I'm pleased to report that I'm still having fun (the most important thing in a daily project, because it would be grim to have to slog through 240 days of something you don't enjoy, and equally grim to abandon your resolution).
Graham Cracker Bottom
Let’s see if the movie is any better. =)
It’s also why he comes off as “gay for Batman.” Again, I do not think it’s because he’s sexually attracted to Batman, but that he’s sexually attracted to controlling Batman in such a deep and emotionally-scarring way.
What a comfort that verse has been to me. During my first surgery this summer, I came to learn....that the hysterectomy....would be in my future....sooner.....than later. At that time....the thought of a hysterectomy was comforting because it meant the end to being bed ridden and blood loss...or "Blood Fest 2009". However, when my Doctor finally said the words, "You are going to need a hysterectomy." I immediately felt the grief settle in. It did not hit me like a punch in the stomach, rather I felt it slowly come over me....like warmth after drinking a hot drink on a very cold day. I think that was what was most surprising about it. I expected the grief to hit me......I'd deal with it.....and move on. Yet, my grief has come in waves.
be unmovable. Don’t allow your thoughts and senses rule you, let God’s Word and
Me: "GO OUTSIDE! NOOOWWW!"
Robinson Cano - Oh the humanity!!! -2 pts
There are a couple of interesting points here. First, we would be remiss if we failed to point out that Heathrow has never really been known for great customer service. Indeed, Gady has commented on the process of clearing customer there in this very forum.
On the child's plate I made a rice flour pastry to wrap around the sausage,
12.8.4 Wheel guns can only run on Air or Nitrogen, not Helium
Starin' at he colorless walls
I've tried a few of Dogfish Head's offerings in the past, but never their World Wide Stout. Many people have raved to me about how good it was, so I finally decided to bite the bullet and pick up a bottle from St. James Beverage. So glad I did.
There are two components of Media Fluency. Firstly, the ability to look analytically at any communication media to interpret the real message, how the chosen media is being used to shape thinking, and evaluate the efficacy of the message. Secondly, to create and publish original digital products, matching the media to the intended message by determining the most appropriate and effective media for that message.
Armoire is a brand for the confident and sophisticated ladies. The outfits are created based on modern simplicity and fine tailoring. Its effortless style exudes timeless versatility and a structured yet feminine silhouette, envisaged to offer nothing less than perfection.
Sometimes life does not leave time to bake a loaf of bread. Even with a bread machine there have been months during that past year in which I could not convince myself to bake a loaf of homemade gluten free bread. That’s pretty bad when you consider that the recipe is fairly simple and quick. I’m forgiving myself though, since I’ve technically had a “bun in the oven” for 14 of the last 17 months.
they say that it doesnt matter how busy a person can be but if you cares for that person, then you should be able to make time for that person, if they dont then they dont care as mush as you thaught they did.
Neither party is blameless for the decisions that led to this debt, but both parties have a responsibility to come together and solve the problem. That’s what the American people expect of us. Every day, families are figuring out how to stretch their paychecks a little further, sacrifice what they can’t afford, and budget only for what’s truly important. It’s time for Washington to do the same…. – USA Today, 7-21-11
I went back to work on Monday after three weeks off. People keep asking "Are you better now?" and my answer is "Yeah - really well actually!" - like it's a surprise or something. It's great to feel well again.
For a single thing
I envy the air,
“I want people to watch Carmen Sandiego because if they steal something (referring to a particular episode), they got to give it back. It teaches them a lesson. I think people should watch Sherlock Holmes because in the episodes, Sherlock Holmes solves all kinds of mysteries. Sherlock Holmes is a serious man. I think he is serious because he solves mysteries. I liked Gadget Boy better because Gadget Boy is hilarious.”
I DO shop for gifts early.
medications prescribed by five
Lessons From the Monster
Eleven authors of young adult fiction, including several New York Times bestsellers, share strategies, tips, and tricks for writing engaging work for tween and teen readers. You can choose three of four informative sessions to fill your three-session schedule, including "Unforgettable Characters," "Heroes and Villains," "Realistic Dialogue," and "Edgy Fiction." Please select your three sessions before calling to register by viewing class descriptions below.
Specifically, the report states that the founder of the Community of Christ was Joseph Smith III, not — you know — that other Joseph Smith.
He was mayor when the Statue of Liberty came to town, officially accepting the gift from the French in 1885. That same year he successfully secured the permission to have the body of Ulysses S. Grant buried in the city, in the ostentatious mausoleum that would be known as Grant's Tomb.
Google Reader and RSS Feeds are somewhat obsolete. This has come over the past few years, but there are still people out there who are using RSS Feeds. Google Reader lets you basically design your own online magazine that you can manage and read most recent updates. It is quite easy to use, I played with it a fair bit and it was easy enough to add someones blog to the reader list. I can see the benefit for people who manage multiple blogs they follow. Google Reader also allows searching and reading bundles. You will find nothing new on Google Reader that you cannot find on Google Search. There are some RSS feed/reader programs out there, I have never had an enjoyable experience with them, but I understand some are popular.
As well as all these ‘retail’ catalogues, you might be like us and receive a bunch of ‘gift catalogues’ from charity organisations. I think these catalogues are awesome! Such an easy and great way to be generous, and also a bit of a conversation starter if you give these gifts to someone who has never really heard of a gift catalogue before. I think it is a little confusing and perplexing for some when they get a gift, but don’t actually receive anything tangible, except the blessing of giving!
A child is a person. He has real needs and real feelings. He may have limited ways or abilities to express himself. You can help him figure out what his needs are and you can help get them satisfied.
Responding to the Problems of Radiation at Fuel Pool at Unit 4
Every day for nearly four weeks, there was Cindy in her lawn chair, sweltering in the Texas sun, watching while Bush's motorcade came roaring down that narrow country road, kicking the dust in Cindy's eyes!
Chaturvedi and colleagues looked for HPVs in cancers of the base of tongue, tonsil and oropharynx collected by cancer registries in Hawaii, Iowa and Los Angeles from 1984 to 2004. They found that HPVs were present in only 16% of tumors during the 1980s, but by 2004 over 70% of these tumors were HPV positive.
Here's a shot of our family doing one of our favorite activities (a little sarcasm here but not completely sarcastic)... birding! Mom and I saw a flock of pink birds over this bay a few days ago so we tracked them down and drove as close as we could (almost into the water) to get a good look at them.
23. TranSiberian
As well as being well-researched, this book is highly entertaining, with several chapters ending on cliffhangers. I even checked Amy Butler Greenfield’s website to see if she had written any other books which blended fashion, history, politics and science into such an absorbing read. Maybe a non-fiction version of The Color Purple? I’d buy it.
Despite all the good things about The Avengers, I feel compelled to point out a few problems. The action and characterisation and humour are all exemplary, but even given the movie’s lengthy duration they appear to have squeezed out most of the plot. The story is rather straightforward and looking back on it I’m not completely sure I’m sold on some of what happens, in terms of character’s motivations. And while the script does a commendable job of combining the plots of the original Avengers origin from 1964 (disparate heroes join forces to stop Loki) with a storyline from Mark Millar’s Ultimates reimagining of the team (covert agency assembles gang of freaks to combat alien invasion), the Chitauri themselves feel like a rather generic and undeveloped threat, just inserted to provide a gang of mooks for the team to clobber and to provide an appropriately epic threat for the final act.
The last few weeks have seen Tennessee on several “worst of” lists for women. The popular iVillage ranked us #40 among the “worst states for women” – for our lower rates of college degree completion, lower earnings, low levels of representation of women in state government, poor health, attacks on women’s rights, and other factors.
The following knowledge has been acquired by yours truly in the past two weeks:
Roll out the crescent rolls in a baking dish or cookie sheet that has a lip. After beating the eggs (I usually add a little milk, salt and pepper), pour it over the crescent rolls. Add whatever goodies you want on it; crisp bacon is always my favorite.
3) Mask the winter-white
As we are embracing this life of saying "yes" and meeting everyone's needs, as we are learning to live without external controls on food and sleep and behavior, as we are all exploring our passions and reconnecting with who we are instead of who we were told we should be, time and time again we get snagged on the old feelings of lack.
In more relevant news, the writer of Sally Forth (rather an underrated strip if you ask me) keeps a webcomic called Medium Large that referenced the Great Pumpkin yesterday. (Warning: language, NSFW)
The Last Song (2009)*
Many thanks to Justin Meyer for the generous donation of his gently-used old gear, which will now be put to use bringing you people to the slopes of Winter Park on the Trestle Bike Park downhill trails. Just because I'm making it look easy doesn't mean it is...
£4.7m operating profit down 36% - impacted by disruption and carrying costs post sale of free trade business
forgotten about them (till the rock love), these cute wee blocks. it may have been twenty but more like twenty five years ago that i made these for my children. (can't believe i misspelled puzzle, eeps!) i recently took them over to a wood worker friend and asked him if he could cut a few more blocks like this please. i think i'd like to make some more.
Jesus lived out a compassionate and merciful application of the law that emphasizes loving God and people first. We see this as he spends time with his disciples on the Sabbath, and allows them to pick grain to satisfy their hunger. We see this as He restores a man’s withered hand on the Sabbath.
Here's the basic plan the gals and I intend to follow after you draw your gun:
And we headed back to get Eme, then home. And made some nachos for dinner. And then Jake started up about "Why can't I sit on the couch to eat dinner???" Sigh. Because kids can't eat on the couch. And he wouldn't let it go. And was being mean and hateful. And I was patient for the longest time. And then he was disrespectful, and swearing, and throwing chips at me, and swearing, and I was trying to pull the chips and dip out of his hand. Yeah, it went out of control fast.
"We have no faith in Great Britain, its culture, its ideals, and its people".
Miller NH, Katz VL, Cefalo RC. Pregnancies Among Physicians: A Historical Cohort Study. J Repro Med 1989; 34: 790-795. 796
Other possibilities:
To save me and you a lot of time, buy pre-made Empanada discs or rounds. You can find these frozen in ethnic food stores or Mexican food stores. If you’re in Portland, go to “La Grande” near 122nd and Division. They sell smaller rounds (about 5 inches wide) and larger rounds (7-8 inches wide). I bought two smalls and one large for later use. For my filling I chose a standard picadillo filling (or ground meat). I added beans for extra protein and filling and lots of vegetables and sazones.
talents are you may find out through this exercise, and these lessons,
He is gone. They’ve cleaned up the doorway and hosed away the chalk scrawl. I could just make out the word ‘squallitaire’ in marker pen on the letter box. No doubt they’ll come out and clean that away too.
Nature
“You’re right…” She fell into silence again, and the only noises were their somber footsteps.
Up blindingly in streetlights would walk—for safety—
2. Blue Breeze (Oberg, Fredriksz) 8:15
For I've fought with the law since I was seventeen,
As Grue was leaving, Shadow Stalker screamed from the kitchen, a strangled, muffled noise. Grue paused, waited a moment, and then continued in the direction Imp had gone, opening and closing the door at the end of the short hallway.
Things to change: I’m horrible at starting stories; this whole section may not be needed at all, depending on where the end plot actually goes. Creme’s history could definitely be worked in elsewhere. I also would start the story with the two of them waking up at home, not with the riots, because that way more backstory can be added. I also would need to work on how close the narrator stays to either character (having the narrator view things from Creme’s perspective as a young child is hard). Also, I’m pretty sure I messed up completely at one point and just rewrote a paragraph without deleting the previous one. That happens sometimes, I’m sure you’ll forgive me.
He put me down for being vegetarian and mocked my passion for obtaining higher education. And yes, he proposed in a sort of “Let’s get married and you can work full-time to support me and my kids,” sort of way.
In 1964, John made the Phillies at the start of the season. He was the team's primary 1st baseman until Frank Thomas was acquired on August 7th. Herrnstein played in 125 games in his rookie season, with 61 starts at 1st base.
Upon Sheila's advice we stopped at The Quilt Studio in Omaha for some fabric shopping on our way back to Ames. It was great advice. We found fabrics for two new projects. Now we just need to find the right backgrounds.
“It was quite a marathon,” said Air Force Cadet 1st Class Jordan Keefer of Cadet Squadron 37. “For most of us this is a hobby, so it was a lot of work, but it’s what we like to do.”
Dinner for two at one flat price. It will include two salads, two entrees, dessert and a bottle of house wine or champagne. Reservations requested as space is limited. Throw in an additional $10 to partake in the New Years Eve reggae dancehall event that will feature live music and DJs, complimentary champagne and ball drop countdown. Must be 21 or older.
But what will be the legendary conclusion that Christopher Nolan is promising?
who died suddenly in the third year
A Merry Christmas to you all,
Attached to the package is a letter which the narrator reads after his shift. He accepts the conditions it offers in order to continue opening the rest of the package. Upon skimming through the books found within, the narrator learns that the past President of the United States, Abraham Lincoln, was a Vampire hunter. This collection of books were his journal entries – “an altogether astonishing, heartbreaking, and revolutionary document.” The entries begin with 12-year-old Abe hunting a turkey for his family, as directed by his father. Upon shooting it, Abe realizes his accuracy failed him. He watches in horror and guilt as the turkey struggles and bleeds to death before him. Abe was not a killer. He was a child and couldn’t bare the thought of killing anything else, ever again. However, this anti-killing attitude changed after he learned the true cause of his mother’s recent death, and the threats Abe’s father undergoes from a strange, dark man. From that point on, Abe made a decision: “I hereby resolve to kill every vampire in America.” This is the moment where the book takes off. From here, the reader watches Lincoln train and learn from a befriended vampire who he meets on his travels (I’ll leave this for you to figure out who he/she is). Lincoln learns the proper technique to destroy these vampires and goes on to get revenge for his mother’s death, as well as for others who have died at the hands (and teeth) of these vampires.
Atwater Blocktoberfest
Oh wait...
The day consists of an introduction by Program Chair Jacqueline Jones LaMon, followed by workshop sessions by genre. There is a Faculty reading and a Q&A with students in the afternoon.
P.S. 241 Emma L. Johnston
Happy Monday everyone! I took a break from the computer this weekend and was shocked to see all the new followers when I logged on last night. Thank you Kirsten for introducing me to so many new readers, and welcome everyone...I'll try to be on my best behavior at least for today!
1. The vegetable peeler, apple corer and the safety guard off my mandolin (I think they are in kitchen utensils cahoots together)
Now the valet's being pretty cooperative, even consenting to letting us search him, and I can actually appreciate the fact that he's got what at least looks like a straight job after doing 15 years inside. So we call for an available narcotics dog and I write him out two warning notices for his infraction (improper backing and no seat belt), taking as long as I can to give the K9 time to arrive. The dog shows up in a few minutes and I give the valet his warning notices--no fine and no points because he was respectful and cooperative and I didn't feel like jamming him up--and then my partner had him stand aside (and away from the club) while Riker the Landshark did his thing. As expected, the dog hit on the center console and the ash tray, and now we've got all the probable cause we need to search the car thoroughly. But before we can start, Mo'Neek, the owner of the car, appears. (Yes, that's her real first name. I shit you not.)
(when Apollo’s howls are loudest),
Thinking of looking to switch ones cell smartphone sometimes especially soon? It’s best to absolutely look at a good 12 month contract phone cellphone deal. This is a terrific pick since you can actually select a brand new device whenever everyone finish typically the period from just one 12 months. The particular reputation of these legal agreements with regard to mobile phones phone heightened very. To manage upward when using the maximizing request, almost all of the system service carriers really are presenting 12 months contract offers on mobile phones. Keep in mind although while they conduct strive plus touch 18 month contracts indicating individuals pick up virtually 50% more sections lease away with the pocket. For taking pleasure in cell phones utilizing lots of large conclude attributes using cost-free presents or possibly free line rentals, 12 months written agreement mobile phones is often the most beneficial decision.
I'm finally getting to share some pics from the Illinois Reading Council Conference in Springfield, IL, last week! First, it was AMAZING. Like, amazing amazing. I couldn't believe how huge it was. They were using meeting rooms throughout two big hotels and then also the convention center for exhibitors to set up. And then people still stayed at even further hotels and were bussed over. I heard there were about 3000 kindergarten through college English teachers there. So cool!
No narrative. Obama doesn't have a narrative. No, not a narrative about himself. He has a self-narrative, much of it fabricated, cleverly disguised or written by someone else. But this self-narrative is isolated and doesn't connect with us. He doesn't have an American narrative that draws upon the rest of us. All successful presidents have a narrative about the American character that intersects with their own where they display a command of history and reveal an authenticity at the core of their personality that resonates in a positive endearing way with the majority of Americans. We admire those presidents whose narratives not only touch our own, but who seem stronger, wiser, and smarter than we are. Presidents we admire are aspirational peers, even those whose politics don't align exactly with our own: Teddy Roosevelt, FDR, Harry Truman, Ike, Reagan.
If you would like to come to our website to see what deals on your favors that we can offer you than please come visit us at www.favorcentral.com.
This is probably the most common of the reasons I have heard. Everyone around Christmas time seems to be saying, “I want this! I want that!” This is one which worries me sometimes as well. It is so easy to get pulled into the temptation of just wanting a lot of nice stuff. But that is selfish and arrogant. On this account, I think everyone needs to step back and look at their lives. Has Christmas become about getting a lot of nice stuff to you? If it has it might be time for some radical changes. But is what I don’t think you should do is go around anouncing your asceticism to the rest of the world and looking down on those who do not participate.
V/A - Rotten to the Core (SIN 1982, comp with Ism, Squirm, Butch Lust and the Hypocrites...)
Hello Monday! My household is mostly well now, and we even got out and enjoyed the weekend. I hope you enjoyed yours as well. Did you make it to the World Market Friends & Family Sale? Never one to let a good coupon go to waste, I popped in and picked up some pretty linens for our Easter table.
The defiled conscience… Titus 1:15… “Unto the pure all things are pure: but unto them that are defiled and unbelieving is nothing pure; but even their mind and conscience is defiled” (KJV). The idea here is that the wicked, while they remain unrepentant, are constantly become worse and worse. Everything they do increases their depravity… Their minds (ways of thinking) and conscience are polluted to the point that they can no longer differentiate between right and wrong. Doing evil deeds defiles the physical realm… This is bad enough… but defilement of the mind and conscience is the worst kind of pollution.
In closing, if you were pregnant, would you consider whipping up one of these? It's not at all difficult and, wearing one, you never have to worry about overeating. I'm wondering why scoop-front men's pants have never caught on. WAIT -- STOP RIGHT THERE. IT WAS MY IDEA!!
We further wish to state that up till now no feedback has ever been received from Delhi patent office on any of the search reports submitted by us in spite of our repeated requests. If they had any comments or feedback (positive or negative), they could have communicated the same to us in the first instance. Without knowing the background and context of the whole matter, it is unfair on the part of commentator to question the quality of work done by us or highlight only a particular portion of certain document."
So, how about YOU? What helps you battle the self-doubt bug? What inspires you to keep going?
To participate, simply visit http://www.facebook.com/PerfectBridal during the month of November 2011 to enter the contest and vote on your favorite photo essay submission!
As a result, he gave de Soto a grant to lead an expedition to Florida to conquer, and subdue the population and bring back the riches. He was given the rights to take what he wanted and enslave the native people if necessary, to aquire it.
Annabella Wings of the Morning
The flowers and leaves were stamped with versamark and embossed with Melon Mambo and Wild Wasabi embossing powders, cut out and popped up with a dimensional.
9. Doctor 1
43. That’s amazing! You’re eyes are the exact same color as my porche!
Hiding away in their baby’s crib.
Kamla Rani’s government booked prime time on all local television….a virtual media blitz….to trot out David Abdullah, Makandal Daaga, Ashworth Jack, Prakash Ramadhar and the Rani herself to remind us that we must be afraid of the PNM….doh put the PNM back there…We do real thing for all yuh….look old ppl could travel on bus and ferry for free…look we increase NIS…look…look…look….and you start to realise that the reason Kamla Rani’s speeches sound so desperate and out of touch is that she is desperately out of touch.
It’s rather exciting not knowing what’s coming next. I rather think I’m made for this sort of life. Every person you meet seems to draw out a different side of you (for better or for worse). Kipling said, “If you can talk with crowds and keep your virtue, Or walk with kings – nor lose common touch.” It’s funny how subconsciously I’ll alter my language in order to find acceptance with my driver, or someone I meet. “Bastard,” “Bloody,” “Crap” became regular devices around the rougher types. It didn’t take me long however to figure out that it wasn’t my language that got me accepted, it was just being authentic. Thankfully I scrubbed that approach before it was too late. Truly it was God providing, not my use of colloquial language!!!
Mrs Sulis had gotten distracted during my hastily delivered speech and simply let out a long sigh down the line. “Okay then,” she replied finally, “thanks for letting us know.”
I considered several trail possibilities on Sunday before settling on the Eaton Canyon to Mount Wilson route. It's little long, considering I haven't managed much hiking the past few weeks. However, it's a short drive, which would give me the most time hiking versus driving. Also, there are several logical turn-around points on the way to Mount Wilson, so if I got tired, I could always bail early and head back down.
Child Grooming should be a Felony charge, accompanied with any charge of child sexual abuse including rape, sodomy, molestation, incest or other sexual misconduct.
One High Town resident said she was upset at the way the plans had been portrayed to the neighbourhood by the English Defence League.
stanza 4
16) How to use GRI effectively. Is it the entry point, or the end-game?
I'll try and share any projects and ideas I come up with, and if you like, dear reader, you can add yours to the comments, or link to a blog post. Then we can all benefit from each other's ideas.
04. Rock On
If I understand this correctly, you want to know who gets all my crappy junk after I’m dead (not my awesome stuff). In all honesty, I would probably bequeath my silly possessions to the local Goodwill or sumsuch. But then, I don’t know if even they will accept a truckload of donations containing nothing but merchandise that says “Spawn” on it.
There is a reason most groups who become cult favorites never make it in the mainstream: a weak link is somewhere in the chain. Either they are good musicians but don’t have the songs, or have the songs but maybe a terrible singer who just happens to own all the amps and a van to drive everybody around to the gigs. Kak’s sole album was released in 1968 on Epic. All the trademark sounds of the day are in place: buzzing guitars and cosmic lyrics, and some nice vocal arrangements with a Donovanesque feel on a couple of numbers. HCO 97658 opens things with a classic sounding 1968 guitar lead, and is followed by Everything’s Changing, another up tempo blast that let’s you know this will be a guitar dominated LP. I hear a faint resemblance to The Buffalo Springfield on Disbelievin’; Lemonade Kid sounds like Jerry Garcia circa Dark Star. Overall, this is a solid period release which comes closest to sounding like Moby Grape through its guitar/multi-vocal approach, and one indication why they didn’t make it. Kak disbanded before getting off the ground, having only played a handful of live shows before packing it in. In those days, your NEXT band was the one that would conquer the world. Singer/guitarist Gary Lee Yoder’s next stop was a post-heavy Blue Cheer. On the current Cheer web site Kak is dismissed as a poor man’s Moby Grape, but that’s a little unfair. Sure, they sound a bit like The Grape, but I don’t care if a band sounds like someone else, as long as the material is good, and Kak in my opinion were a good band. The next time I see Dickie Peterson (B.Cheer leader) I will ask him what the bad blood is all about. Maybe Yoder gave him a bad count on some shared weed they purchased; whatever happened must have been a heavy scene for it to linger on for the last forty years.
Christopher Canning
K: We are responsible for the residents of the State of Israel. Canada is responsible for the residents of Canada. Australia, for Australia. And that’s just fine. We are not responsible for the lives of Canadians in the same way as we are for the lives of Israelis and vice versa. This is completely accepted and completely moral and no one questions this. We don’t have one world government that is responsible for everything. We have states with their own responsibilities.
I recently joined a Bead Guild, so I am really looking forward to see what that brings. The very first meeting I just happened to sit next to the beautiful Leslie and Brenda who have been wanting to learn how to make a cuff bracelet for years. How's that for fate? I just happened to know how to do it! So our informal bead embroidery group has now expanded by 2!
Nineteen drawers of varying size, some below the desktop and some above, whose mundane occupations (stamps here, paperclips there) hid a far more complex design, the blueprint of the mind formed over tens of thousands of days of thinking while staring at them, as if they held the conclusion to a stubborn sentence, the culminating phrase, the radical break from everything I had ever written that would at last lead to the book I had always wanted, and always failed, to write. Those drawers represented a singular logic deeply embedded, a pattern of conciousness that could be articulated in no other way but their precise number and arrangement. Or am I making too much of it?She isn't making too much of it. Having always thought of herself as 'only a temporary guardian' she remains unprepared for the impact of its removal from her life, something that happens when she is contacted by someone claiming to be the daughter of Daniel Varsky. Having happily written seven novels on it she finds her creative routine disturbed sufficently by its absence to encounter something close to a breakdown, finally settling on a trip to Jerusalem where the desk itself has travelled after she let it go.
7) Wire -- Pink Flag: NO 6) Misfits -- Walk Among Us: YES
Why I wanted to listen to this one: I enjoyed a previous book by this author and thought it would be fun to have a lighthearted book to listen to while driving back and forth from work.
Tonight my favorite two teams of MLB go head-to-head (though of course the Red Sox are always my number 1 team). The former Red Sox (awfully sad that he left after the 2004 World Series) and now Cleveland Indians’ pitcher, Derek Lowe (4-1, 2.39 ERA), takes the mound tonight against Josh Beckett (2-3, 4.45 ERA). The Red Sox are now back home after losing their road series against the Royals last night in a disappointing 4-3 loss.
Iraqi security forces detained about 300 people, including prominent journalists, artists and lawyers who took part in nationwide demonstrations Friday, in what some of them described as an operation to intimidate Baghdad intellectuals who hold sway over popular opinion.
One of the most misleading habits of realtors in Mexico is translating the title Notario Público. They don’t mean to be misleading, of course, in fact I’d bet they’re trying to be helpful. But in reality they’re only confusing their American or Canadian clients. Because here in Mexico the Notario is nothing at all like the notary they’re familiar with back home.
Makes no difference who you are
So what’s next? I can’t say that I will never work full time again, but if I do it will be on my terms for my families benefit, not on some bosses terms for their families benefit.
Always start at the sale rack when you go into a store. If you can find what you’re looking for on sale first you’ll save yourself a lot of money. I usually search the sale rack at multiple stores before I buy something that’s not on clearance.
The piece above is another of Peter's. We saw a demonstration of how he made these forms then had a try to make similar for ourselves.
Monday, Laz and I participated in the 10man Alt Run. Tuesday, it was a run through the LFR system. Wednesday and Thursday were 25man BH and Undying Resolution’s regular 25man runs.
and his courts with praise!
2010.08.05 Iraq Tikrit 3 0 An al-Qaeda attack leaves three people dead.
I just can’t wait to see what Dan is planning to do before the Christening! Stay tuned.
Courage is working on your goals, step by dogged step, even if you don't feel like it. Courage is venturing out of that "safe" zone, where you put a little bit of your soul on the page. Courage is pushing through the "my writing is total crap" stage. Courage is handing your writing over to a critique partner. Courage is clicking "Send" on that query letter email. Courage is looking at a hill ahead, cringing, and running up it anyway, because sometimes the harder you work for something, the more it's worth it.
Now I'm back to them
Personally, I’d pick up those gloves, and learn all this… But at the end of the day, since being a God fearing Christian is such a huge factor, (pfffft) go home and wash his clothes, cook his food, and wait for that bastard to dare say something about the meat.
The interesting thing about truther theory is that, for all its vast implausibility, it is widely believed. According to a general population poll carried out by Zogby 42.6% of Democrat voters believe some version of it versus 19.2% of Republican voters. Nearly half of Left-leaning voters say they believe in a total absurdity!
The little shit has offended, the shop cannot detain him, citizens arrests are not legal. The little shit walks ot the shop with his stolen article and the cops detain him. He is released on a good behaviour bond, his fourth. He gets to court and is released on a good behaviour bond, under parent supervision...the same parents that have previously told him to nick a bottle of grog "cause he's a minor, the copper's not gonna do nutting to you mate". The little shit, well he gives the coppers a finger and goes indoors, knowing he is safe within the Ozzie media who will defend his iniqueties to the death.
“Not surprisingly, shutting down a printing press suppresses countless legitimate content publications by legitimate users of Megaupload,” Goldman adds.
That was all it took.
Fruit & vegetables:
Dementia in people with intellectual disabilities is most often the same as for anyone else. The greatest challenges you may face are the personality and behavioral changes that often occur with this disease. If someone has a history of behaviors it becomes even more difficult to determine if the new behavior is part of that pattern or dementia related. For this reason, often times the early warning signs of dementia are ignored.
ATTORNEY: How was your first marriage terminated?
not only about 'selling a lot' ! lol
And today, I was fortunate enough to be featured with my mosaic tiled fireplace I did a few months back.
However, I soon found myself stalling. My headlong onward rush into a brand new novel soon ran into a mire of confusion and frustration.
In this regard Jude is reminiscent of the work of Flann O’Brien and even Buster Keaton, and it shares their plasticity of form and robust disregard for plausibility. The world is distorted this way and that, for all sorts of structural and opportunistic reasons. (Gough has described the book as being about “the bizarre love triangle between consciousness, language, and reality”.)
Time flies by without us knowing it. It feels like yesterday when I started A to Z Challenge and zoom! here we are, the last entry for the challenge. Let me interview myself (pathetic lol!) about what did I gain, the obstacles in the challenge, etc.
I got to see all three of my beautiful nieces in one day. (the 382 mile drive was totally worth it-- and yay for my 15 year old car- she did it on one tank!)
At least it will be a very cute baby that I love very, very much waking me up : )
- You openly discuss what you have learned in health class and want to talk to your mom about sperm and “wet dreams” because you still tell your mom everything. You scream at her things like, “I just want to know if this “SPERM” with the “FISH” that is going to shoot out of my pee-pee is a liquid or a solid?!”
Brittany: I draw inspiration from those brides who have an absolute vision for their look on their wedding day - but would rather spend money on having one more special guest than a sparkly hairpiece! It just doesn't make sense for us to own such expensive things that we can only use once!
Patient: (cell phone ringing, pt answers it and tells caller that the doctor is in the room) "I drove."
Well, time and again, the class is winding down and I look at the clock only to see that it’s already almost 7:45 am. At this point, I quietly roll up my mat and leave. And I’m not the only one. A fair number of other students file out as the teacher puts on the final, “meditative” song. I find this entire situation disrespectful to the students and to the practice itself. The teachers are quite enthusiastic in trying all kinds of acrobatic movements and devoting much time to various asanas, but yet this final pose is treated as an after-thought.
Oh, heck, no. Our bad.
"In his new book, Mr. Dallaire takes a hard look at the recruitment and coercion of child soldiers (250,000 boys and girls around the world), a phenomenon he has studied for more than 10 years (at Harvard University’s Carr Center for Human Rights Policy and at Dalhousie University in Halifax) after encountering some of them in Rwanda. Rather than focusing exclusively on their rehabilitation and reintegration – the picking up of their psychological pieces after the conflict is over – he describes them as a “weapons system,” in an effort to bring about the eradication of their use in the first place. Understanding how they are abducted from their families, equipped with light arms because of their proliferation around the world, and forced through rape, drugs and other abuse to fight when they have no understanding of the complex issues involved should not leave readers in despair, he says rather with a sense of outrage and the need for intervention."
While many will find this episode slow, it may not necessarily be a bad thing. The new series is off to a good start, setting a good foundation for character development of the three introduced, and showing what may become interesting relationships between them.
Tomorrow starts a new month and a new focus. With the challenge over, what plans do you have? Me, I will finish a short story I am working on, catch up on emails, newsletters and that sort of thing, and then start on my novel. I think it will be a very exciting month!
This experience happened on an island in the Philippines named Misamis Occidental. The location is about 1 hour drive away from the city of Ozamiz. Whether it was north, east, south, west I have no idea (wasn’t paying attention in geography class).
I had no idea there are three types of knots, and four types of stitches in bead embroidery. My first attempt used a basic “hem” stitch. I used embroidery thread instead of nymo(r) – which is a no-no. Lacy’s Stiff Stuff? Wasn’t using it properly. You can stitch directly onto the Lacy’s; I used ultrasuede and an embroidery hoop. DBE clarified not only the “how” but the “why” certain things are needed with this beading format.
5) Incorporate atemi waza in your training, for real…practice and hone your punches and low line kicks.
My suspicion was that of all beers these were the least likely to go flat after a few hours. I was not disappointed. Mostly due to what was available at the Dorstvlegel beer store in Antwerpen they were all of (almost) the same "vintage"- a fact I was quite content with as I started my tasting session, since these are prime examples of beers that develop over time.
The historian said that if Mr. Obama insists on using complete sentences in his speeches, on Election Day the public may find itself saying, “Okay, subject, predicate, subject predicate – we get it, stop showing off.”
it ain’t me babe- bob dylan
The museum was divided into several sections, starting with a general introduction to Nazism. While some of the exhibits were photographs or facsimiles, many were authentic artifacts of the time period. One of the first items that I saw, to my shock, was the label below from a canister of Zyklon B, which had been found by a Dane in the hold of a sunken German ship.
86. Your Gracious Host-Sleepers Awaken (Self-Released)
And accept God's flawless plan—
There’re folks who when they pray, would say, “Lord Jesus
Nor are craft breweries entirely innocent in this practice. Customized brewery glassware is often provided to retailers, specialized glasses etched with the company logo that are meant to be the ideal serving vessel and volume for perhaps a boozy barleywine or pungent sour ale. For high-gravity products or limited-edition exceptions such as these, smaller portion sizes are understandable and acceptable but too often a simple sessionable amber or wheat ale is served in the same glass. Breweries do not object because they are eager for the logo to be displayed and happy for the free promotion.
For the illustration I wanted to evoke a sense of Earth Day and of the dichotomy of making green choices…and choices that end up not being green. I wanted to avoid using a big earth for Earth Day…been there, done that. Instead I wanted to focus on the personal side of someone making green decisions. I came up with the concept of the Earth being used as the lens in a pair of sunglasses. One side the earth is green with blue ocean in the lens. The other has the continents in red and water is gray. On that side of the figure the color scheme is gray on the figure with red in the lens and background.
“Match: Rangers v Dundee United – 5th February 2012
The Gollum thing: knowing you have a stash of pretty little treasures to covet is irresistible.
7. Talk loud. Keep your voice down. There is no need to draw attention to yourself or your business by talking so loud that others can hear everything you’re saying. When we were kids we were supposed to learn how to use our “inside voice.” Now that we are adults, no one should have to tell us that. You think?
His fragrant Sybaris, than I, when first
The thing is, though, it’s the kind of stroll only a God seems to be able to make.
But the idea of writing my own story would not die. I kept thinking about writing a book. Which is all good and well, except for one problem.
Whatever your favorite way of believing in what’s to come, it is certain that the beings we were before summer 2010 have moved into a new level of reality. We are being led by avatars, contemporaries, new thinkers — and crop circles — to become our higher, nay, highest selves.
of when and just-because, looking
I bought this stamp over a year ago I believe and have just now gotten around to using it! I absolutely fell in love with it and I'm so glad I used it for this challenge. i didn't plan on the card being mostly pink and purple but hey, it works!
Stalactites hung from the roof like angel’s wings
About Bishop Lifting Products, Inc.
After Katie attended the wedding shower, I met her at a local grocery store where she and her friends had left the truck in perfect “jumping” position just in case.
Zoo tomorrow with my cousins and there kids. London on Friday with friends, Saturday making a single girls to-do list with friends. My other friend has appreciated Linsey Kelks new book so inpiration has hit the both of us. Lots of chocolate and wine (not me eughhhh) it will be. Sunday is the end of an era as we watch Harry Potter part 2.
It is also available in FL at fine apparel stores (eg ft lauderdale) along the gulf and Atlantic Coasts (eg Venice beach).
up the germs of
into a groove. I swayed in awe just bewildered.
–Illegal immigration would be a thing of the past, since undocumented Mexicans wouldn’t actually be walking on the soil of the United States, but instead hovering several feet above it
Another pain: While the shuttles are supposed to run every half hour on weekdays to Brooklyn Borough Hall, we waited a full half hour and there were many people who had been waiting before us.
No one had ever taught me that Brasil is Bigger than the States!
“Are you sure?” I asked Gene, who, ironically enough, is a vegetarian.
fishcake, cut into strips
The group walked along Pacific Street, passed the now blocked and soon to be destroyed Carlton Avenue bridge up to Vanderbilt Avenue. Then the group turned and headed back on Dean Street. It's remarkable to walk these long blocks, a space larger in acres than the World Trade Center site, and imagine the overbuilding proposed for this area. I have a lot more thoughts about the experience, the fellowship of the community and the activities of the photographers which was benign and jovial despite the weather-insanity. But I'm still too numb from the cold to process. So thoughts, soon come, for now here's some choice photos I took of the moment.
B.B. King – “King of the Blues”
The Gettysburg Times (5 August 1929) reported the fatal shooting of a ukulele player by former major league baseball player, Samuel (Red) Crane. Crane shot John D. Oren at Bria’s Hotel and Crane’s ex-girlfriend, Ms Della Lyter, as the two sat at a table in the Hotel.
We eventually grew up. We got married and created real families, and life got much, much better. Still, a part of me has missed the frequent gatherings. Others from our group have felt the same way. A couple months ago several people lamented our seeming lameness and complacency-- how easy it has been to give up trying to organize gatherings and to measure the time between social events in months rather than in weeks or days. Of course it cannot ever be like it was all those years ago, and indeed it really shouldn't be.
Global warming strikes again — the tides of change are breaching the ruined walls of Fornost. With Update 6, this super-long instance has been closed for renovation most likely in the same manner that the Great Barrow, Garth Agarwen or Helegrod instances were long ago. However, Turbine has yet to release any information regarding the changes so I’ll take some creative liberty here to speculate upon what exactly these changes could contain and the implications they might have on the game.
- You have 48 hours to get back to me, otherwise a new winner will be selected.
PAPER DOLLS
Why would Edinburgh deny permission for such a useful and unique chance to alleviate some of it's congestion? Well, they are hypocrites who live up their own arse, to put it politely. They always talk about their green polices and anti car regime but when a cheap and viable solution to some of it's traffic problems are presented to them, what do they do? Send the idea packing.
Loki: I thought the beast had wandered off…
I am also entering this card in
When you trust yourself
So, with a little holiday thrown in, now and again, I’ll be typing that last page of the novel in no time at all. Definitely my finest hour indeed.
Wheel turnin' 'round and 'round
May they all , listed above, ‘Rest-In-Peace’ as dear friends n’classmates of we, who yet remain . . .
In 2007: 18th National Poetry Slam in Austin, Texas:
Modern cities rely on sewers, water pipes, gas lines, rail lines, gasoline storage, bridges, roads, freeways and their overpasses to be there. 9 oil refineries were damaged beyond repair. Roads, rail lines, bridges and pipes were moved 20 feet which brought civilization to a rapid halt. Most food spoiled in the first few days after each of the 4 quakes. The loss of refrigeration was a serious blow to the supply of food but far worse was the series of 15 nuclear meltdowns. Food production was irradiated. The President of the United States had to declare a ban on the exporting of food. But many countries had already declared a ban on all imports of American food until the situation of food safety could be properly evaluated. Food prices worldwide soared causing famines, riots and revolutions throughout the world.
Net worth
If it’s not forever, it’s not marriage.
Foreign Gay & Lesbian
So, the day before my colonoscopy comes and I begin my prep.
2. The Things We Did Last Summer - The Beach Boys
So, just about a year ago I wrote about the issue of focusing on practice development coming out of tax season (http://brandcraft.wordpress.com/2011/04/19/anticipation/). Has anything changed in the 365 or so days since I wrote that entry? No, probably not. You still need to work on filling the pipeline, creating connections and pulling in new clients. So, if that is true, why do so many accounting professionals feel that there should be nothing that they need to do for the next month (or longer) but relax and get away from work? I don’t have the answer to that one. I agree that after tax season people should get a chance to recharge the batteries and grab some R&R but the need for business development will still be there when they return.
Some of the earliest are only primitive wood-carvings, but produced with love and displayed with reverence - a show of the real Christmas spirit I’ve seen in the Caribbean, in Europe, all over the world, and which owes nothing to fashion, or climate – or time.
I am so fed up with this I could just puke. I wish I throw brown ink on every blog which obligates me to decipher two words of randomly spaced consonants and vowels printed in messy, illegible and irregular fonts and transcribe them into plain arial print. My eyes are bad enough with one cup of coffee in the wee hours without being subjected to this unnecessary stress test. Add in my aged fingers and age-appropriate impatience. All conspire to make any first draft of mine appear to have been written in shorthand. Sometimes I leave entire syllables, even words, missing. Thus handicapped, whenever I manage to complete an intelligible comment, I then have to contend with a Captcha drill? Come on, already!
This perverse vision of sex and death as an interconnected pair is contrasted against the lush romanticism of the scenes between Daisy and the lodger, though of course death hangs over this pair too in the form of the suspicions about the lodger's identity. There's a beautiful image of the lodger and Daisy walking through a tunnel at night, silhouetted in the midnight blue, a street lamp shining by a bench at the end of the tunnel. It's a very romantic image, and they sit by the lamp, embracing, gradually moving in for a kiss, while Hitchcock defuses the sensuality of the moment by cutting away to the jealous boyfriend lurking nearby. The potential kiss is interrupted here, but the tension resumes when Daisy and the lodger return home, and again ever so slowly seem to fall towards each other, their movements hesitant but graceful, a sexy slow-motion waltz of restrained passion and delayed gratification. Hitchcock then shoots their actual kiss in such an extreme closeup that their faces seem to tower on the screen, two planets being sucked into one another's orbit at a glacial pace. Then there's a high angle shot that mirrors the earlier one where Daisy was kissing Joe, her eyes glancing upward, but here she has nothing to see above her, no greater desire than what she already has with this man; she's not looking for something else, just rolling her eyes towards Heaven, and after a moment she closes her eyes again, satisfied.
"They clamoured for rice - unhusked paddy, such as they were accustomed to - and, when they found that there was none, broke away weeping from the sides of the cart. What was the use of these strange hard grains that choked their throats? They would die. And then and there were many of them kept their word...Scott understood dimly that many people in the India of the South ate rice, as a rule, but he had spent his service in a grain Province, had seldom seen rice in the blade or the ear, and least of all would have believed that, in time of deadly need, men would die at arm's length of plenty, sooner than touch food they did not know."
Yeah, this is the pessimists’ portion of the list. But, it’s true. Don’t fool yourself and say, “Oh I will never ever regret having children – not even for a second. I will love my babies with all my heart and could never imagine life without this pure joy.” Go join Liars Anonymous right now. There will be (at least) one moment when you wish you had stayed far away from conception of any kind. Yeah, it will most likely go away fairly quickly, and in some cases it might not go away until college. But, prepare yourself for it. Because if you do feel this way you are only one thing: normal. Some of you may enjoy every diaper change, every spit up, and every temper tantrum anyway. And for people like you, eventually there is something called puberty, and I ask you revisit this list then.
My Abbu is a big time walker. He even walks now twice a day for half hour each even though he is a stage 4 cancer patient. When I was a child, every night after dinner, all the family would get out for a stroll. We have lived in a variety of houses so in some homes which had long driveways, we would just walk to and fro. In others with safer colonies or military cantonments, we would get out on the streets. But every night we walked. It was a time for conversations, checking what was happening in each other’s lives, getting an exercise and just enjoying the stars. There was not a lot of TV those days. In fact as children we would get only one hour of TV every day. It was usually a Pakistani drama on Pakistan TV. We would eat our dinner sometimes before and sometimes with the drama and then we walked and talked.
His movement with six million adherents has spread throughout Central Asia and has served to unite such newly created Russian republics as Uzbekistan, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Turkmenistan, and Azerbaijan into a pan-Islamic state.
The voice boomed back, “No, this is the manager of the skating rink!”
Time keeps going, the game changes, and life keeps throwing stuff at us, be it new babies or a change in jobs. So we change, too, like renovating a house. But the foundation remains the same: our core beliefs, the idea that community comes first and that we’ll never forsake fun in the name of personal gain. Names and faces are hardly the same as they were three years ago. I’ve long since relinquished being in charge of recruitment when I lacked “sitting in front of computer at work” time.
How does HIV/AIDS spread to other people?
But I wanted to drop in and say hi and to let you know I’ve missed you. Oh, and I also want to tell you about this new religion I’m thinking about joining. I have been reading about it in my students’ critical thinking papers I'm currently grading in which I have them analyze an interview between Bill O’Reilly and Marilyn Manson.
I dropped Hank off at daycare and set up the road a few miles, near the Pennsylvania border. I stopped and stepped out in a few spots. Looking for rising fish. Looking for a hatch. I saw neither. I enjoyed my coffee. The river gage had read 80cfs. Looked about right. Time for a few more sips of coffee.
I was not happy with how the Google Doc was working. This option goes right to our own Sugar & Spice database.
It seems that people are quite willing to settle for a nice, cozy social club that talks about God. Without getting too derailed, let me just say that people in general and church governance specifically seem unwilling or unable to be radical as Christ was radical.
The exterior of Rosewood Cottage is painted a deep rose shade and has a climbing rose painted on one side and a smoke tree in bloom on the other. There are window boxes with flowers and a small cozy porch with a wicker chair and some interesting architectural details to add interest.
But it says “to enter the Kingdom of God”. I believe this verse is illustrating a person who is not yet in the Kingdom, and may very well be addicted to their own wealth, hording it for their own pleasures. Of course it is difficult for this person to enter the Kingdom because they’ll have to give up their idolatry! But 1 Timothy gives clear instructions for those are already in the Kingdom and are wealthy, and it’s actually surprising what it says:
When asked whether or not she and Huntington had sex, she responded: ‘If I answer this, you will know what happened.’
He said senior ANC leaders had discussed reasons why Mugabe may be loath to step down and believed he was worried about facing an international tribunal. Mantashe cited the case of former Liberian president Charles Taylor, forced into exile and then extradited to The Hague where he is on trial for war crimes arising out of the vicious decade-long civil war in neighboring Sierra Leone.
* Secretary
This complex tapestry of intimate and rewarding friendships with other women is the backdrop to my daily existence. When I need to talk to someone about family problems, its women that I turn to. When I’m broke and running out of food, it’s women who have taken me shopping and given me money to tide me over. When I have a wedding to organise, it’s women who step up to the mark and make it happen. Every significant event in my life involves other women, surrounding me, helping me, plotting and planning and getting things done.
- 125g of butter
5-6 broccoli florets
Ladies, feel free post a comment and lend a hand to the men out there who are still having trouble understanding... so we don't have a failure to communicate.
So, what is the best triple ton? Sorry to disappoint you but I’ve got no idea. I’m not going to attempt to compare Clarke with Bradman or any other player who I’ve never seen. But you’ve now at least got some facts to think about when debating Clarke’s performance.
With that Iris was off slurping and sucking that cock, gently massaging and pulling on the balls through the hole. She started to shake again and I knew she was cumming on my cock again, I grabbed her by the hair and pulled her back up to my mouth. As I began to kiss her I pushed her ass against the wall, I felt behind her and grabbed his cock and guided it into her well used pussy. She began to moan deeply now; started kissing me tight I knew he was all the way into her and began to pound her nicely. Once again I guided her mouth back onto my hard cock; it didn’t take our “friend” long before he grunted deeply and blew his load. Certainly not done being pummeled I grabbed her and spun her around sliding into her freshly fucked pussy; I reached down and began to finger her ass – she moaned with delight. I bent her over and without hesitation slid my hard cock into that ass; she became more vocal the harder I fucked her and it was making me even more crazy. It didn’t take long for the booth next to us to become occupied again, this time the “friend” didn’t waste anytime just presenting his hard cock to Iris. As I fucked her ass she reached down and began to stroke the cock; he almost instantly began to shake and forced himself hard against the wall. With a muffled moan cum shot out all over Iris, with this she once again tensed up and began to cum, I could not hold out any longer myself and blew a hard load into her ass. We both quickly gathered ourselves together and made a quick get-away into the parking lot and the safety of the car, we giggled the whole way home….now that was an end to the year….
TO GLAZE: Stir the egg and water together, and brush a bit of this glaze over each rugelach. Sprinkle the cookies with the sugar.
oh and 5, yes 5 loads of laundry between the wee hours of the morning and tonight. running out of clean undergarmets is not a good thing. that job is now done. during the evening wash ... I actually took my sewing machine out of the box....I haven't used it since January -- I think it missed me. I played with my fabric purchases ... oohhh so many pretty choices and
On Wednesday a story appeared in the Barnet Press featuring the young Tory deputy leader, Councillor Daniel 'John' Thomas, who has been forced into making an embarrassing apology for misleading statements he made in regard to the future of staff who are about to be outsourced. the article tells us:
I love the visual of another medal around my neck
There are whole days where I feel fine. I feel strong and competent even though I feel sad. I go whole days where I don’t even cry. But then, out of freaking nowhere, I start to cry. And I’ll cry and cry and cry and cry. I’ll cry until I think there are no more tears left–then I cry some more.
Funded by a Swiss non-profit, Medicines for Malaria Venture (MMV), arterolane (codenamed OZ277) was revealed in 2004 in a paper published in Nature. It was developed as part of a collaborative drug discovery project that consisted of researchers in the US, the UK, Switzerland and Australia. The aim of the project was to discover a new chemical entity (NCE) that could overcome the limitations of artemisinin, a widely-used antimalarial drug.
Not everyone gets to do that, apparently. The other day, a friend told me she was jealous because her job entails what feels like an endless cycle of work, and nothing ever seems to be finished. Imagine never being able to say "check." It would be like always eating but still feeling hungry, or like always wanting and never being satisfied.
Then there’s Mummy’s Boy. That whole situation had bad idea written all over it. And the deal was sealed when he wanted me to stay the night. Dude. I don’t do staying the night. Sleeping is more intimate to me than what we actually just did; I am not staying the night. So he wrapped his arms and legs around me (did I mention he was about 6’6???) and I was trapped by what felt like a boa constrictor that had 5 heads. Obviously once I wriggled my way out of that I took on the mentality of a short distance Olympic runner, with my car being the finish line.
For example, when I was thirteen years old, I played for my junior high school football team. I tried so hard to be good, but I just couldn’t get it together at that age. I remember hearing the words run through my head as I was running out for a pass, “Don’t drop it!” Naturally, I dropped the ball. My coaches were not skilled enough to teach us proper “self-talk.” They just thought some kids could catch and others couldn’t. I’ll never make it pro, but I’m now a pretty good Sunday afternoon football player, because all my internal dialogue is positive and encourages me to win.
I listen. They just have to speak in bullet points.
08/30/2010 SELL 0.01 audnzd 1.2672
I lost it when I was sober. To a 19 year old Marine.
I tried to find out how someone could do that without my permission. The representative gave me a sketchy answer, then told me I could put a purchase blocker on my number that would keep it from happening again. Sounded good to me, but I had to giggle when I realized that I'd signed up for "Parental Controls".
And speaking of journeys, we are both beginning to plot and pray about our next step. In our immediate future, we have a trip to Mexico City coming up in January.
1-8 oz. package cream cheese
Each year when these lovely berries start to ripen we journey out to gather them for syrup.
Since I cannot produce art, I always love to look at a good work of art. Which is why when I see something like this, I become agitated:
A little unforeseen surprise
In the meantime white South African are being slaughtered like pigs in an orgy of retribution and by way of penance for Apartheid – a system that was implemented precisely to preserve white people from the attentions of these savages that we see today – but has been twisted by the international bleeding hearts society to be perceived as a diabolical mechanism for persecuting blacks. Opponents of apartheid by way of their voluble opposition, sanctions etc, etc. have shown that what they understood of Apartheid was that white South Africans could only function if some perverse desire to see blacks squirming dying and being humiliated on a daily basis was assuaged sufficiently for them to be able to build the South Africa that the ANC inherited, took credit for and then proceeded to destroy.
Oh, I sure understood that I wanted to react. I wanted to jump into the class the next day and tell my kids all the ways they have not been meeting my needs. I wanted to behave poorly. Really, really poorly.
i've been trying to remove some long gone blogs from the sidebar and for some reason blogger won't let me save my changes!! (who knew that blogger doesn't always cooperate, right?) any suggestions?
(Some confusion here, as often when meetings in Edinburgh talk trams with councillors, but Ian and Cameron both stuck to the point that a mass transit system is needed for Edinburgh.)
I was in the mood for a movie about Navy Seals that have to travel back in time for a rescue mission and “100 Million BC” was perfect.
[L]et’s remember a key method by which China achieves its phenomenal growth: by systematically denying the civil and economic rights of its domestic population. Chinese workers have no meaningful union rights. They are paid pitifully low wages (averaging around $0.50 an hour in 2006), and have no hope of securing anything better. That’s a key way in which China’s export-manufacturing sector booms: low wages equal low costs, after all.
and enormous camels and things,
Patrick begged me to talk to a friend. I refused. How could I admit what I had done to my closest friend? I worked so hard at hiding it.
ps. I thought this child of mine was shy and timid. Not so much! Every morning I drop her off I hear something new and usually something funny that she has done or said to someone. Most of it seems a little out of her element but I guess she's a little chatty. Thankfully, though, its nothing getting her into trouble and fingers crossed will stay that way.
Malema has warned that the youth league will only back leaders who support its calls.
Nowhere is this disjunction between what ordinary Americans really think, and what the media and political establishment tells them they think, more clear than when we talk about democracy.
I attached the vinyl lettering to the outside of the glass.
I turned up for an interview with the managing director of this major electronics company, expecting to be told that I was stupid----he started of by saying that he couldn't offer me the accounting job--even though I had aced the mathematical testing, the aptitude testing said that my abilities should be used elsewhere---I stood up, shook his hand and thanked him but he stopped me---no Clyde, we wont give you this job but what we want to offer you is a cadetship in Electrical Engineering--we will pay you to go to University and you will work with our engineers here and interstate---you will be fast tracked and from what your testing reveals, you should have a 5 year degree in 3 years.
K.C.I.
2 cold hot-smoked salmon steaks, just on their own, to be enjoyed at room temperatue
What is fun is that Susanna has chosen an incredible range of images. She is all inclusive, using designers that have credentials and pedigree for miles, along with bloggers who are decorators, stylists, and designers. She very much has her finger on the pulse of the populist decorating movement, and how the "pros" are influenced by the "ams". It's like street fashion making it to the runway.
In short, it is inconceivable how the Formula One authorities can proceed with the race in Bahrain given the current circumstances. In addition to the increasingly escalating security situation, with security forces cracking down on peaceful protesters with excessive force on a daily basis, proceeding with the race would send the wrong political signal. The authorities in Bahrain desperately want to present an image to the outside world that stability has been restored, and necessary measures to improve human rights have been fully enacted. By moving forward with the race, Formula One becomes complicit in the regime’s bad behavior by giving it a cover of legitimacy that accepts a model of stability through repressive force.
I think, driving north at least but never getting far
Your Score: 8
2. Season the fish with salt and pepper. Place a large pot in your sink, and add warm water until the pot is full and the water reaches 115 degrees. Place two fillets side by side in a gallon-size heavy-duty resealable plastic bag. Drizzle fillets with oil. Submerge the bags halfway into the warm water (this creates a vacuum). Seal as airtight as possible, pushing out any excess air. Repeat with the remaining fillets.
Writer-Director Jeff Lieberman put out a few films over the years, one of which was the often overlooked 1973 film “Blue Sunshine”. Although not traditionally considered a zombie film, I stick this one into the underrated ‘zombieless zombie movie’ category, with movies like Romero’s “The Crazies” or Rollin’s “Les Raisins de la Mort”. As I hit play on the DVD, it opens with a message from the British Board of Film Censors, telling us that this picture is rated ‘X’. Hopefully for EXTREME.
My name is Lucia (pronounced Lu-See-Ah…the Spanish way, not the Italian way!) and I’m a 17-year-old girl from Beijing. Now I live in the suburbs of Detroit, where I run cross country, watch soccer matches religiously, and read way too many historical romances. (They’re my guilty pleasure!)
Crepes, is a must try - people told me. So, I did. :)
Store cheesecake bites in an airtight container in the refrigerator for a up to a week, or well wrapped in the freezer for up to a month.
Do you see that book cover I posted here, Love in the Balance? It arrived in the mail last week. It has a character, Evonne, who is loosely based on you. And the scene of the murder trial, news reports, the sentencing of Mr. Brooks are all factually correct. Some of it sounds like it came right out of the TV news reports, "Our top story tonight is the double murder this morning of two local women at their home in a quiet rural neighborhood...It is unclear whether the murders were the result of a boundary dispute. The women were in the process of installing a fence separating their property from that of the suspected killer." There is one mention about a daughter, Jenny, who spoke to the reporters and at the funeral. Her words make people understand that her mother was a loving mother, grandmother, and friend-and that living a lesbian lifestyle does not mean that you are someone who is separated from the normal embrace of family life. That message is what I try to share as well. I think you would like the book. It's about self-acceptance and celebrating life.
Why is their no list of demands? Well, for one thing, this is a peaceful protest, not a hostage negotiation. And specificity would only serve to dilute the message. If the group comes out to say “We demand you tax the rich,” would that change anything? Even if the government capitulates and does it, would that solve our problems? Not even close. End the wars? Nope. Jail the bankers? No way. Don’t cut Social Security? Nada. Affordable health care for all? Not in the least. Specific policy positions no longer serve any purpose. We have an overall systemic problem.
Those with knowledge really need to trash such beliefs and drill some senses into those individuals minds who choose to “Invent” their own new words.
Springtime she'll be dressed with white lilacs in rusty pots...
What’s the best tablet under £300?
For anyone kind enough to wonder about my other writing project, I thought I'd provide some insight into my new routine. It goes something like this:
So, for a grand total of $12 I got all of these great things. Oh, and one other frame that I’m already using for wedding pictures.
Today's card is one I did up for my niece's high school graduation. The image is from Unity's Your Wings Exist set and I thought it and the sentiment were perfect for a young lady about to embark on her life's journey. I love this image and plan to use it more. The papers are from First Edition's Isabella 6" x 6" pad and the buttons are from a package of Prima wood buttons and those little things are just the cutest! The swirls are a Marianne Createable and I've used Copis to colour the image.
Friday: Reader question about being too matchy.
He defended the programme because it targets only those individuals who are known to pose a “significant threat” to the United States and constitute a “legitimate … lawful target”. But he refused to elaborate on how that process of scrutiny takes place. “How we identify an individual naturally involves intelligence sources and methods, which I will not discuss.
By releasing these things, I will release myself. My true self will emerge. I will be able to release a more positive, happier person into the world.
Dear James:
Generally, though, I prefer it here. I like the history – you can be in a McDonald’s and it happens to be a building older than Country A. Political ideaology is a lot more progressive and liberal. We, as a gay family, have rights here that are probably years away in Country A. This year, in fact, our civil union will probably legally be changed to marriage.
Emptying the cup is easy: pinch the bottom and pull the cup out. Empty the contents into the toilet and wash the cup with soap and water and reinsert. If you're in a public restroom (not likely, since you only need to change it once in the morning and once at night), you could clean it with packaged alcohol wipes.
Meri went back to take some towels in and came back stunned. "Mom!! Did we ALWAYS have a sink in there?"
- Milton Meltzer, Nonfiction for the Classroom
The book, "">One Yard Wonders" has been around for awhile, heck I have had it for about a year and I am just now getting around to making something out of it. It is a great book with some really neat projects. I love the premise of the book, everything in the book can be made with one yard of fabric or less and for the most part everything is fairly easy to make. It is just a great book that really makes sewing seem like something that is doable for everyone. Check it out if you haven't had a chance.
1 hots
Prizes: $10,000 USD (1 artist will receive $5,000 and 5 artists will each receive $1,000). Dave Bown Projects will be buying works of art, on an ongoing basis, from select artists as submissions are received.
enjoyed drinking it hot that Yes, I would like to have cold
Still I wish U heaven
Joshua Ross Blade and I met back in 1999, in Helaman Halls, during our freshman year at BYU. we have been friends ever since. we have been through a lot together, but have remained friends through it all.
We will give you every tip we can as the weeks progress.
During the Reformation in England what was considered orthodox belief changed rapidly and so it was all too easy to be classed as a heretic. Although John Wycliffe had urged people to return to scripture rather than the teachings of people in the 14th Century, it was not until the 16th Century in England that the Reformation really made an impact with Luther’s teachings crossing the English Channel. Many in the church opposed the new teachings but Henry VIII wanted to be in charge of the church in England and so made the church independent of the Pope. Some supported this move and others were opposed to it. Once Henry died, more reform came in under the advisors of Edward VI, his son. Once Mary came to the throne in 1553 she was intent on returning England’s church to union with the Pope. She set out to deal with heresy by burning as many heretics as possible. In five years 300 people perished on her orders.
REALITY: This is a potentially deeply flawed lineup. Carlos Pena is in decline, Jose Molina could be a black hole at catcher and Luke Scott is Luke Scott. Yes, Desmond Jennings is a star in waiting, but he has yet to play an entire season. And the Matt Joyce/Ben Zobrist combo equals one all-star player, but that’s not enough.
Life is all about change; anytime we allow ourselves to get caught in a holding pattern, or just doing something a certain way because we’ve always done it that way, we run the risk of complacency. I never want to be complacent as a teacher, and I never want to do something just to do it. I’ll be sure to explain this to my class tomorrow as part of my explanation for why we are not going to continue to read Abe Lincoln Grows Up.
As the ‘no photo’ days add up, it becomes easier to stay in bed and not think about photography. There are always excuses. I have too much work waiting for me to even consider searching out a photo-op. I’ve shot everything in this town. That location doesn’t look all that interesting. I’m getting too old to haul all this gear around just to get a photo of something in the dark. Who’s going to be upset if I don’t post anything today, or this week, or this month? It’s very easy to convince yourself that it just doesn’t matter.
Evening Telegraph - Saturday 07 January 1899, page 3. According the company's books, there was a surplus of over £400,000. Not too bad at all. On a side note, see how they brought in someone from Bernard's to value the brewery stocks.
I know, that I know, that I know, that everything will turn out all right and I WILL be on that plane on March 10th, but I have no idea how that is going to happen.
1 ¼ c. packed brown sugar
“We want to make sure that all schools are stretching their brightest pupils and that schools with very able intakes are helping students reach their full potential rather than allowing them to coast along.
Lloyd Brown, 28, Bronxville, N.Y.
He disagreed. He did NOT want to be holding her while that was going on : )
At present, you may follow this link.
Tasmin Archer Sleeping satellite UK
Therefore certain societies prohibit cousin marriages or marrying into the same clans. It has been prevalent among south Asian and central Asian societies but with arrival of Islam and with influence of Arabic culture things started changing in south and central Asia. Even for that matter Prophet Mohammad himself said on many occasions that if you want to have fit and strong child do not marry into your own clan.
I wondered if the children knew there was a link between the famous author and Sunderland. They didn’t. The link was something I chanced upon while doing more on-line research into the family tree. I read that Lewis Carroll was a frequent visitor to Holy Trinity Church which isn't just in Sunderland it's in Southwick just a few minutes walk from where my dad's family lived – Carrolls, all of them!
I guess the whole world has to take a shot at me. I used one hand to rub my tight shoulder and stomped on a bug, grinding it under my foot. Go away you nasty thing.
I’ve heard many accounts of people just going to these ‘Occupy’ protests to ‘see what’s going on,’ and next thing these people know they are getting arrested, making decisions, impacting what’s going on. Unlike traditional collectives, in which one joins a party, perhaps has a membership card, of can tell if one belongs by an identity like race, gender, sexuality (the ‘identity politics’ which began to have an impact after the 1960′s), we see communities with porous borders. We see momentary congealings of subjects that speak for aspects of the fuzzy group, yet not others. People can join and fall away from such subjective formations, and it still continues until it has run its course. Then new networks form.
Recipe: Bruce Weinstein
* Fill the washing machine with warm water and laundry soap (this is imperative…use the amount suggested by the manufacturer).
there is something inspiring and sublime about the little forget-me-not flower. I hope it will be a symbol of the little things that make your lives joyful and sweet. Please never forget that you must be patient and compassionate with yourselves, that some sacrifices are better than others, that you need not wait for a golden ticket to be happy. Please never forget that the “why” of the gospel of Jesus Christ will inspire and uplift you. And never forget that your Heavenly Father knows, loves,
“So be it. Kill him.”
Eighteen year old Micha West’s life suddenly takes a turn for the best when she wins a high school talent show. With less than two weeks left before she’d be on her own with no job and a place to stay because she’d be too old for foster care, Micha signs a recording contract with Hyun-Gi Rahn, a Korean talent manager. Maybe she should have read the fine print more closely, and then she would have known she’d have to pack up her life and move to Seoul, Korea. What’s an American born Korean to do in such a strange place?
Keep oven running.
In 1865 J. B. Lightfoot argued against Bauer and the Tübingen school. The Judaizers were not authorized at all by Peter or the Jerusalem church, although the Jerusalem church were slow in stopping them. The Jerusalem Church wanted to find a way to compromise between the radical teaching of Paul and the traditional teaching of the Judaizers. J. F. A. Hort suggested that these Jewish opponents of Paul were lead by James, although mistakenly so. James himself did not authorize the teaching in direct opposition to Paul, but his followers took James’ example of a Law-keeping Jewish Christian to the logical extreme and forced Gentiles to keep the law.
Thorn
I could have gone to a birthday party yesterday but I was not in the mood so I didn’t go. Maybe I should have anyway. Then again, I was glad I didn’t go because there was heavy raining in the evening and by staying home I didn’t have to go out in the bad weather. Being at home alone wasn’t that great though.
I'll pass this along to:
So, I thought I could share a few tips for all of the “3aroosas” out there when it comes to choosing a partner.
"But no one else is going to be nice. It's just going to be me, being nice, all by myself."
Pacifica Indian Coconut Nectar Roll On Perfume
Not wanting to delay any longer, but finding he had no choice, Ben looked back to Solemn, who sighed, 'Single you nonce. It's a one-way-trip isn't it.'
The Enjoy Life Mega Chunks for baking are the best! I use them all the time. They are made in a dedicated nut and gluten free facility, which makes them safe for my kids and yet you'd never taste any differences. These should be the standard for all chocolate baking as far as I'm concerned.
When we wake up the next day, we're in paradise. The leaves are rustling in the woods, and I go down the big hill to the lake, where I'll sit with a coffee and watch the water. During the day, I'll sneak off to do some tai chi in the big open field at the top of the hill. We'll walk the property together, maybe head out onto the lake in the rowboat. We'll read and watch movies. We'll cook long elaborate meals and talk about life and stuff. I might get some writing in, but mostly we'll relax.
Look! March-bloom, like on mealed-with-yellow sallows!
I have come to at least two decisions. One, I am going to start volunteering. The kids and I have chosen Ronald McDonald House. It has personal meaning for us. My husband and son spent a week at Ronald McDonald House when Stefani was first diagnosed with Leukemia and she had to stay in the hospital for her first round of chemo. I stayed in the hospital room with her, so I was only able to visit the House when Tony and Teo took us through it. It is a neat facility. What a blessing it was to us. We've never lived close enough to be able to volunteer before. I'm finding that all of the places and things that I've wanted to be involved with, i.e. volunteering at a cancer center or a children's ward, but never lived close enough to, are all right here. I have spent the last year so completely wrapped up in my stress and my needs and my unfulfilled dreams that I forgot that it really is NOT about me. Two, I am going to read through the entire bible this year.
That said, we are to now start replacing our old, bad habits with new, good ones. We aren’t simply to accept that at times we’ll fall still fall to sin, instead we’re to ask Christ to give us strength to overcome, and to start doing something else, that’s actually productive, instead. i.e. Instead of gambling, maybe we should read a book on money management. Instead of getting drunk, maybe we could attend a prayer meeting. For every temptation we have, Christ is more than able to help us overcome. As I said before, our old habits will still try to worm their way in, and we may at times still draw away from Christ, and fall to them. But while we’re strong, and close to Christ, we should try to draw even closer, and get still stronger in the Lord.
This new world is NOT a land of grey. It is a land of vibrant colors. A land filled with different people that believe different things. A land that is filled with tolerance for those differences. That does not pretend that there is only one way to be. One way to live. A land where people actually care about other people.
During the rally concerned residents expressed many truths about pawn shops and how instead of provinding economic opportunity to people with low funds they actually help keep people down. This post is intended as a brief but I'll be happy to go into details in the comments section of this post.
Green split peas are slow-simmered with a homemade smoked tofu "ham," and it's really out of this world. I may never eat split peas without tofu ham again! The tofu gets its smokiness from Liquid Smoke, it's saltiness from soy sauce, and that special brown sugar taste from maple syrup. Fabu!
For instance, I don't believe in a shush library. If your library is quiet, that means people aren't in there. That's bad for your stats and for your community. And I did let people help in the kitchen (even though the mess ... omigod the mess ...). And I basically stood back and let this lovely, loud, gregarious, generous family come into my house and take over.
Then on friday morning at 12:01am EST/5:01 GMT, the blog hop will begin!!
After the first suspicious death, the captain and his crew are grimly determined to carry on as usual. Frustrated and dismayed by their inaction, Sidney decides to take matters into her own hands and launch her own investigation. She enlists the halfhearted help of her friend and business partner, the flamboyant and fun-loving Jay Wilson.
Perhaps the mystery is the difference,
In that fall, she went over backward and conked her noggin on a table or chair on her way down. Amazingly, nothing bad resulted from that except a goose egg on the back of her head. The bump disappeared after a couple of days.
The following questions should be answered before with most everything:
When I went to visit my Grandma Adelaide the summer of 1997, I didn’t know it would be our last visit.
Awww...I love that someone finds us inspirational! We'll keep doing what we are doing then!
something with the speaker. You cant hear a caller.
They have come out with the IPA on Tour. In it comes Blind Faith (not an overpowering IPA, but one that helped get me started into my love of hops- then it disappeared). I am thankful that they brought back this beer, but they took their most creative beers away. Hopefully they can come out with some beer that brings them a bit of redemption.
Funerals are not for the dead but for the living. They are to celebrate the life of the person who has passed away and an opportunity for those left behind to mourn and release. Most of all, the funeral is to bring some finality and closure to the living. They are not confrontational, they are not for arguments or drama, they are not for revealing hidden information; they are simply meant to end the last chapter of the persons life and create a place of grieving and celebration for those lives that were affected.
necklace: made by me
RTE reports that Treasury is unhappy with NAMA’s conduct with respect to the Battersea Power Station site on the south bank of the Thames in central London – pictured below – and it seems Treasury believe the company has lost out “on hundreds of millions of euro in potential future profits”
Apparently I was wrong about my Internet navigating abilities.
I know, I know, I usually post pics of everyone from the weekend, but this time is different. Yes, I remembered my camera, but I had forgot to charge the battery. So my apologies.... no photo album of all the busy quilters and their fabulous work. Instead, I came home and took a picture of the piece I made Friday night, during my normal Friday Night Fun. For those of you who haven't seen the results of my Friday night pieces, my goal on Friday night is to make something fun and quick to get the juices flowing for the weekend. I don't have a pattern, sometimes an idea, and yet other times I just cut fabric and go.
So I guess I just want to say that I’m alright?
For example, I have a friend in his late twenties who was diagnosed with stage four lung cancer less than a year ago. Doctors weren’t sure about his prospects, and after an exploratory surgery where it was decided they could not remove his lung, he was put on a very aggressive regimen of chemotherapy and radiation. He has spent more days than not feeling like the floor of a New York taxi cab, but he has continued to trust God and to be his beautiful, ebullient self through it all.
boiling oil. They finally exiled him to the Isle of Patmos, essentially
Phillip Lim was one of a handful of designers who took the first tentative step out of the 80s and back into a more sophisticated decade--the late 70s. Yet, unlike many of his compatriots Lim, as he usually does, was careful to make sure his designs were reinterpretations and inspirations of that great decade when disco rose and fell. Lim's collection featured roomy pants very reminiscent of a Lauren Hutton in her prime. The collection ended in a flourish of purple dresses that would fit right in on the floors of Studio 54.
Okay, I've had it. I try not to be too political here in blog land, but I do have strong opinions on some things. Today I'm thinking about TOLERANCE. Come on, can't we all just be fwends???
Here is the whole sheet of fishing cuteness....with your freebie sentiment...
Feel up to a little tricky fun?
KESTREL IN FLIGHT OVER THE GAP YESTERDAY.
15. Career?
Or the Preservation of Favoured Hop Varieties in the Struggle for Life.
So not exactly the time of year to be thinking about Christimas is it? but that is the challenge at Secret Crafter this week.
I've been saying for years that waiting until the walking dead are on your doorstep to worry about your armory is just asking to become a brain-buffet. My Zombie Apocalypse motto: Plan ahead!
One day, after the farmer returned from his dealings with merchants in the city, he found his daughter sitting by the cherry blossom tree he had planted upon her birth. Their first child, a boy, had died when his wife gave birth to him, and they had buried him in the spot where the tree now flourished, its strong branches stretched towards the sky, with petals so fragrant that in the height of spring the whole garden smelled sticky sweet. The princess held a flower in her hand, running her spindly fingers against the soft pink petals that seemed to illuminate her pale, beautiful face. Her dark eyes gleamed, then blinked, and suddenly the flower lay crushed against the earth. She sighed, bored, and ground the petal further into the dirt with the toe of her shoe. It was custom of her father to bring home small gifts from his time in the city, and though he felt that his daughter was now perhaps rotten to the core, he could not deny her any desire.
hang on- cause the ride continues..and I thank you all for riding with me.
Me: Who are you missing?
Oddly, at the same time as they want to supposedly make it easier for people to own guns, they also want to increase the number of people that get put in jail for all sorts of crimes. This is strange because the statistics that we already have indicate that most types of crime are on the decrease.
In other news The Parasol Protectorate Goodbye Tea in San Francisco is now sold out. We are no longer taking names for the waiting list. If your RSVP was confirmed via email from Rina, you may pay for your ticket(s) at the door (remember, cash please). An email with further info will go out to all attendees closer to the date of the event.
What if my class submitted issues from within our classroom community, and the students from my friend's school discussed them - and vice versa. Then on a designated day each week, we could meet up in our Avatar Kinect environment - protected by anonymity - to offer possible responses to these classroom community issues. We could further the concept of "walking in someone else's shoes" by having students appear as avatars contrary to their body type, race or gender.
Tri Mode EX Single Stroller Set in Raven Color: Hot Chocolate For Sale
Before graduating to studio films for the remainder of his filmmaking career, Stanley Kubrick cut his teeth on several lean independent films with producer James B. Harris, chief among them was The Killing (1956), a masterful take on Lionel White’s novel Clean Break. Adapted by Kubrick with dialogue written by none other than legendary crime novelist Jim Thompson, The Killing tells a fairly standard tale of a heist gone wrong. However, it is how Kubrick tells it, which makes the film one of the all-time classic noirs. He rearranges the sequence of events in a way that puts a fascinating spin on how everything goes down, decades before Quentin Tarantino made it cool again with Reservoir Dogs (1992).
The land is not to be permanently sold because it is Mine, and you are only foreigners and temporary residents on My land. You are to allow the redemption of any land you occupy. (Leviticus 25:23-24)
The most important control on a filter is a knob marked Cutoff. The filter acts a bit like a gate which you can open and close. When it's fully open the sound comes through unchanged. As it closes more and more of the treble part
No, Mary–imagination doesn’t count.
2) favorite Halloween candy?
I never stitch things twice but this will be an exception I think. I love the elgance of this and I get to use my hand dyed threads from my stash.
“I could see that all you guys had was a stalled car…” It was at this point that he gestured to the woman passenger beside him. “I knew that I could get through and I need to get my wife to the hospital,” he said.
So when I needed to clean out the closet (having promised to send my Minnesota sweaters up to my cousin in the mountains) the first thing I had to do was round up extension cords, power bars and lamps.
The Earth blossoms
My Mom knows I adore her(even if she didn't vote for me again!) and there is no way I could list only 10 reasons. How do you break a lifetime into 10 things?
To be over the hurts, the pains and the aches.
If you live in my town and want to use her, let me know - I'll be glad to pass on her name!
When does this happen with this writer? Oh, any scenes with sex somewhere nearby, definitely. I am the least likely writer of erotica/erotic scenes on the planet, I assure you. But in The Coward’s Tale there are a few of those—scenes where characters are really longing for someone they want, or scenes where a couple are exploring each other, or a character is watching someone undressing ... (The first might be in ‘The Window-Cleaner’s Tale’. The second and third, in ‘The Piano Tuner’s Tale’.) And yes, there is what is called unkindly, a penetrative sex scene. Oh dear, and me an old bat too.
That’s just my opinion. But unless you’re over 40, I don’t want to hear any argument.
Why am I still trying to learn new tricks and the use of new things? Let me write down the truth.
If you've been making Halloween cards with a black cat and you've been coloring in your cats solid black and they just don't look right then this may help. The secret is to color it with grays, not black. To understand the difference between shades of gray you might want to look at this older post about coloring black things.
Hour 1 (2pm)
It's not fashionable right now to suggest that exposing this strategy is a huge opening for Obama because everyone sees this as a razor-close election, and it could turn out to be just that. But I still stand by my thoughts that ran through my head as I was hearing the announcement at 11am Friday the 29th: this move by McCain has more than a decent chance of destroying his candidacy and being one of the biggest political gaffes in my lifetime. That's not meant to be an indictment of Palin as a person or as a politician, but as the choice of the running mate for this candidate at this time.
Saturday March 3rd - Green Flash Barleywine
God warns in Numbers 32:23, “Be sure your sin will find you out.” The first mistake was to disobey the messenger and leave the safeportofCrete. Now, they had no human way of stopping this continuing disobedient act. With man it was impossible, but with God all things are possible. (Mark10:27)
America's vital interests and our deepest beliefs are now one. From the day of our Founding, we have proclaimed that every man and woman on this earth has rights, and dignity, and matchless value, because they bear the image of the Maker of Heaven and earth....
I got a flashlight and looked. I could see the kernel and it didn't look too far up there. I covered his other nostril and had him blow really hard. No good. I debated on taking him to Instacare. He kept trying to pick it out and I was worried he would push it even farther up. So, we went.
Nuts and raisins
hovering near oblivion
But the company denies Jordan’s allegations, saying, quote, “any resemblance is coincidental.” NBC has its response:
A clever take on the ‘haunted dollhouse’ scenario. I think we’ve all learned by now that if you find a perfect miniature replica of everything in your home, including its occupants, then you either run away or burn the thing. Fast. Eerie and upsetting, an excellent story.
What about the BME child who speaks two languages and can swear and make racist remarks in a language without being caught out, who will police this situation?.
Me: Yes, yes, he is. It's just pretend.
Taking his phone back, Christian gave her a weird smoldering look, “Want to get out of here? We could just grab a few beers and just hang out somewhere quieter.” Not fully finishing his sentence, he already had grabbed a few bottles and grasped her hands with his. Her black hair hid her blush as she glanced downwards at his sneakers, past all the drunken college kids strewn about the apartment. The frat had achieved what their parties were all about: getting utterly wasted and hooking up with your classmates. In spite of that, Leigh wasn’t fully aware what would happen to Christian and her once they found a more secluded place.
“Yes, in fact,” said Hermel.
Decloakings will be massive and happen for a sustained amount of time.
90 PERCENT DROP IN THE PRICE OF SHIPPING
Since I arrived in DC, a number of residents (some not American) have said to me that Halloween is their favourite holiday. I was never really sure how to take this, given that I had always expected that the more “iconic” holidays (Thanksgiving and Christmas) would be at the top of the list. I mean, traditionally, no one gives gifts on Halloween; there’s no big feast with friends and family; no epic games of corn hole and such like. It’s a holiday based on ghouliest and ghosties and long-leggedy beasties, and whole whack of bloody corn syrup. And candy, of course. As such, I always pegged it as a more minor holiday and one mostly for kids. Boy, was I wrong!!
I tried finding out what you could get for £5 (as pictured above) but really all I came up with was this website called FiveSquids where people will do a lot of things for Five Pounds! The best thing you can get for £5 coins though is a £5 note. It will ultimately lighten your purse and sit much nicer!
Eleventh Doctor - Matt Smith
*You can cut this recipe in half if you don't want to make as much.
What's better than free art?! Besides maybe free ice cream, but I don't have any of that for you, sorry. Today, I'm sharing a new (to me) resource for free botanical art. TOTALLY FREE, courtesy of Botanicus.org.
*I do not like resolutions, but I feel my blog may need one. I am beginning my 5th year of blogging and have resolved not to do Project 365, instead I am going to do Project 180. I will try my very best to blog 180 times this year. Keep me on top of this, OK?
﻿He still needs to get a second coat of poly on the other side of the doors, but hopefully we'll be able to hang them on Sunday and I can snap some 'after' shots to share with you early next week.
1st place: Norway (0.963)
Metro: Cleveland Park or Woodley Park Metro (Red Line). The insider tip is to get off at Cleveland Park so you have a downhill walk to the zoo entrance. Then, when you are done, you can walk downhill to Woodley Park to get back on!
Sometimes that was the case …. but far too many times it wasnt… so… out came the bricks and mortar….
Well the CNY ended yesterday. This amazing Chinese celebration ends on the day of the full moon with the Lantern festival. The children and I attended a Chinese New Year presentation at our library this past Saturday. Children from a local Chinese school preformed this wonderful presentation. We saw a lion dance (Thomas loved it, Anna was scared), a Chinese yo-yo demonstration (Clare and Jon's favorite), a kung-fu demonstration, zither presentation, and more. We were all amazed. I sat there thinking about my sweet baby and our deep connection with this county. It amazes me that Steve and I have always felt a pull to this part of our world. Our two countries, on the surface, are so very different. But if we choose to see the world as our Lord sees this world, we are so much a like. As parents we have the same hope and love for our children. As children we have the same needs and longing to be loved. God does not see us any different. I pray that we will be able to help our sweet girl know that she is part of this family fully and deeply. That despite the way our world may see the differences in our family, that our souls are the same, and designed to be together in this family. Please join me in prayer for all of the children that face this challenge!
This will be a 2 or 3 part blog, as there is a lot of info I want to cover. My goal this year is to be more transparent. I think there are a lot of misconceptions about fitness modeling and the world of physique competitions. What some of us do on stage, in front of the camera and post on Facebook differs quite a bit from what we do in our day-to-day lives, so I am trying to be as open and honest as possible about my experiences in the fitness industry.
WAKE UP AMERICA!
MS: It helped us when we were starting out as a band.
Here are some of those amazing photos from Liz and Nelson's session. I can only imagine what their wedding photos will be like... can't wait till their "NYC/Sex and the City" style wedding is here. I know it will be absolutely fabulous!
This stuff is seriously amazing. I wanted to do a whole post on it with before and after pictures of my hair every time I tried to take pictures my hair didn't look any different. But I promise you, it does. You guys have seen my hair before - it's frizzy and pretty much has a mind of its own. With this shampoo I blowdry it with a paddle brush and it comes out straight. It is by no means perfect but my frizz is tamed and I don't look like I just stuck my finger in a socket. (I have noticed a difference though in whether I use both the shampoo and conditioner or just the conditioner, and my hair just doesn't come out as "straight" or "frizz-free" when I use only the conditioner.)
FYI- 1 roll of Duct Tape covered about 40 water bottles. Not the whole 2 cases, 24 pack.
DAMIEN: Didn’t the horsie already have a name?
More drinking with poker - Bean wins all the money after 10 hands. He does weird poker voodoo.
“Didn’t think it was important. They probably made up those stories just to keep us out of the woods. You know, like those Grimm’s Fairytales. Hansel and Gretel and all those things that scared kids into behaving themselves.”
Tip: Think about using textures, plaid, checks, stripes, argyle, stamped images and sentiments also brads, grommetts, twine, string, burlap, then add the colour - think yellows, oranges, pinks, purples, reds, pastels, and finally add in your neutral. Be creative and have fun!
Tabata Squat
5. Serve immediately with pita bread
We need more hysteria. We need better effects. We need Sean Connery throwing a skyscraper at the meteor in question and shattering it into a million pieces. That's not what we got, but again, this isn't a surprise.
When smouldering Finn and sexy Lucas arrive in Winter Mill, life starts to get very complicated for Faye McCarron.
Yes, I've been gone four months. Various family situations made it necessary for me to first leave Nepal and go to Delhi, then leave Delhi and go to Tennessee. It may not be a valid excuse, but it will just have to do for now.
It's possible that by the time the Republican race gets to South Carolina there will have been some narrowing down of the field as candidates perform poorly in Iowa and New Hampshire. So we looked at some scenarios addressing that. If it was a three person contest by that point Perry would hit 50% with Romney at 25% and Bachmann at 16%. If it was just Perry and Romney, Perry would lead 59-28. If it was Perry and Bachmann, Perry would lead 63-20. And if it was just Romney and Bachmann, Romney would lead 45-40. It's really not a good sign for Bachmann that in a state with a Republican electorate as conservative as South Carolina, voters would still prefer Romney.
Welcome to the real world, George.
sa.lpSecurityDescriptor = &sd;
Here's the thing, it never feels like work. It feels more like a family, a family determined to make a difference in the world and provide safe, decent and affordable shelter for every single person.
Now this isn’t what I normally think of when I think of paper, but aren’t these cute?? They come in several color combinations too.
for vintage shoe buttons , and trimmed the fluffy hair down
The title implies we should feel sorry for D, but he’s not a very sympathetic character. Most of the time he’s a jerk and even though things do not go well for him all the time, it seems to be more of a case of “you sow what you reap.” The film seems to be trying to illustrate the connection between evangelists and rock stars, as on either side of the spectrum it appears to be about money, performance and inevitably betrayal. But there is something missing from the narrative; it just never really pops. It travels a straight continuum, without ever making a strong statement about any of the issues at which it hints – poverty, religion, corruption, superficiality. It definitely had potential, but it never quite got there.
i forgive myself for accepting and allowing myself to support the porn industry who feed into, and support rape and violence by ensuring its continuation within this world through the suggestions that it is okay, based on the manipulation of ‘rape’ and violent energy
Number 1 on my list of favourite short stories is also, by some distance, the shortest. Less than a page of text, barely 300 words - these days we’d call it flash fiction. I don’t think that term was widely used when the story was published back in 1979, as part of Phillips’s debut collection, Black Tickets.
There are plenty of other fun attractions in Wanaka. If you are after thrills, go skydiving or white water sledghing here. How about a game of paintball? Want to play at the Adventure park? How about a movie at the Cinema Piradiso?
immigration. It is difficult, but at the end of the day, I would
Today I woke up from a dream. I don’t know what it was about but it was probably nice. As I got out of bed I felt a pain in my body. I feel that pain almost every minute I’m awake lately. No matter if I walk, stand, sit. Only when I lay down to sleep does it stop, or perhaps I just don’t notice while I sleep. Anyway I know I must go see a doctor about but I haven’t found the courage yet. I always hope pain will go away eventually. This pain hasn’t.
This is one of our digital covers, no pen, ink, paper or paint involved.
- I won't complain about the crowds, noise, or lines. I will rock instead.
*gasp* Did I just say that?????????
So, when these guys speak, that mountain of $28-30 K, God moves that mountain really fast and everyone who has walked this journey knows it. They are not blowing smoke. They are not manipulating God, they know it happens. They've seen that mountain moved over and over for families. And once you see the mountain move only by the hand of God for his children, you tell
Wrong Side Of The Moon
OK, let me explain.
“This is an extension. Extensions are small. It’s just the two of you.”
I was too young to see James Bond.
And the performances are terrific: Cal is the perfect villain and Jack and Rose make the perfect romantic pair. Kate Winslet’s acting assets are amply on display here; her other assets are also amply displayed thanks to the 3D version!!
enforce new “bankruptcy laws” (statutes) that create debtor’s prisons
Sadly, in May of that year, much of the staff got lured away to work in a new hotel in Galveston, and the Driskill had to close. It re-opened in October under new management, but a drought and a bitter winter cost the Colonel his cattle and his fortune, and he had to sell the place in 1888. When he died in 1890 his friends presented the hotel with a life-sized portrait that has graced the lobby ever since.
But nice to see some national level kudos coming to the White River system, which is probably the best known, untapped fly fishing destination in the lower 48. Sure we all know how good the White is year around, but the message hasn’t reached out very far.
Still, the binary reaction isn’t the only factor at work Another bit of practical psychology that’s been used by operative mages for a very long time also comes into play, especially when the politics of an age are more intently focused on denouncing the existing order than in offering a coherent alternative to it. You’ll find this principle expressed in different ways in magical traditions, but the phrasing I first learned is to my mind the one that expresses it best: what you contemplate, you imitate.
You reached out your hands
Vance Patterson (REP) 16.86% 313
And this time…I’m listening to my body.
So I sat down to put this together. With much trepidation and uncertainty, I sat down and started writing, straight from the heart and with great freedom and gusto. Picture a dog in a park on a nice breezy day, running after a ball. Tongue out, tail wagging, happy in the pursuit and the opportunity to connect, running free, wherever the pursuit of the ball leads. That was me, just without the tongue and the tail, at least most of the time. I pursued it just like passion is supposed to be pursued.
In the 'liturgical books of 1962' the ferial preces are sung at Lauds and Vespers only. At Lauds there are no commemorations. At Prime there are three psalms 25, 51 & 52 and the chapter is the festal Regi saeculorum. At the blessing of Ashes and Mass the ministers wear dalmatic and tunicle. Judica me Deus etc is omitted from the beginning of Mass. There is only one collect. The extended kneeling is omitted with the choir rising at the conclusion of the Canon. The dismissal is Ite missa est. Vespers are of the feria without any commemorations.
One last thing... Karla found comfort in this song...it is a beautiful song, and said exactly what she has been feeling. GODSPEED ~ Listen if you have a few extra minutes...
-- Bards Notes, Compass and Boat Quest 3
“Well Betty, I’ll tell you, but only you! This is how it began: I lay on the sofa and Tigerli suddenly sprang onto my leg and started to push the claws of his front paws in and out. He purred contentedly. That’s nice, I thought, he’s thinking about when he was a kitten. His mother has been gone for a long time and he thinks my leg is his source of milk! I read my newspaper and didn’t disturb him. But then he started pushing with the claws of his back paws. It became very uncomfortable. He thrashed about and moved his back up and down, his tail quivered and his eyes looked blank.”
So my question remains, what exactly were we celebrating? The answer, of course, is who gives a shit? Does anyone really need a reason to get together with family and drink beer? I love beer, I love my family, and when the two of these things join forces it is a most blessed event.
Context on the show: Homer’s attempts to get his son back from Mr. Burns prove futile when the evil tycoon locks the door in his face, but not before Homer can utter this immortal battle cry.
I would take a bath, listen to music I shouldn’t be listening to, and I would cut. What I’ve done before wouldn’t be enough, so I would just cut deeper until there was enough blood to bring relief. Then I would take 10-15 sleeping pills, about the same amount of anxiety meds and maybe some benadryl or tylenol pm. I would turn my heated blanket on and listen to music until I fell asleep. I wouldn’t die. I would just have a day or two of relief.
I have a hard time accepting gym related defeat.
Lets hope the local governments reverse the course so that the livelihood of the indigenous people would not be disturbed and that we, the tourists, can continue to appreciate the beauty of the area.
In the show the detectives use a murder board to highlight and focus on the victim, suspects, and any other persons of interest. Donna points out how this concept can be useful to your research as a genealogist. I would agree. I'm a visual person and in the past have used timelines, but I like the idea of expanding upon that. Until your research is arranged in an ancestor board (a.k.a murder board) or timeline you may not spot what you have overlooked. Sometimes a visual organization can point out a gaping hole in your research or give you an idea of some records to look into.
Read the story first, and then let Michael Morpurgo take you through his inspiration for the story here. What do you think?
Very Vanilla Seam Binding: Stampin' Up
As I said previously I do not think Radical Unschooling is for everyone. I do think it could work for every child but not for every family. There are many parents for a variety of reasons who feel this wouldn't work for them. Many folks feel a calling in life. I know many of the Jehovah's Witness faith, for example, share a message of belief that they would say was for everyone. I don't particularly want to hear that message and I politely turn away anyone coming to my door to share their faith. I feel a calling toward letting people know there is more than one way to learn and school is not the only option. I think the difference with the message I am sharing is it is only to people I know and each person has to choose to come to my door (blog) to read the message. Yes other people may share what I have to say but again people choose to come to my blog. If they don't like what they see all they ever have to worry about is an advertisement of sorts on Facebook from someone they know. My message may be aggressive at times but it never shows up at the front door.
Just to let the last challenges winners know, I have been having problems with sending emails and will get their prizes sorted asap!!
Shake that energy free and send it flying! Just one big one will do. Feel the difference? It might make you a bit dizzy and strange feeling for awhile. It also does wonders for the physical body.
Like finding a new place to sleep!
Also, Jessica from Obsidian Public Relations thought I might find this interesting enough to post on my blog, so here you all go:
which should mean I can get back into the sewing room fairly quickly after we eat ....
12And he exerciseth all the power of the first beast before him, and causeth the earth and them which dwell therein to worship the first beast, whose deadly wound was healed.
Let's review why the West is perceived as being soft in the head. Here we have 500 "poor and destitute" Sri Lankans who paid $45 000 a head to book a place on a boat bound for Canada. Now, I don't know about you, but I don't have $45 000 lying around if I were in distress. These people claim to be "refugees", yet this same boat bypassed numerous countries to get to Canada. So far, it's cost the Canadian tax payer more than $25 million to deal with this situation but it's obviously only the tip of the iceberg, because, if these "refugees" are successful with their asylum application, then the generous Canadian tax payer gets to support not only them but also their extended family, plus any new children born for the duration of their lives. How grand is that tax payer? The Canadian government has also identified - shock, horror, you don't say! - that 32 Sun Sea passengers so far have suspected ties to the Tamil Tigers rebels. So, on top of getting to financially support these "refugees", you could also be making a few terrorists nice and comfy in their new homeland....That, children, is why the West is soft in the head. Or, as I like to say: "no good deed goes unpunished!?"
05 The Scientist Writes A Letter
In mass actions, authorities are often willing to release most people if they sign a promise to appear for a court date, or if they post a reasonable bail.
There are a million stories out there waiting to be written. We all have drawers and notebooks full of ideas. And there’s nothing, nothing, that says we have to rewrite the first book if it doesn’t sell. But we shouldn’t ever give up on it without first taking the time to break it down.
Despite the massive amount of money she’ll win, the house will eventually be shuttered and abandoned when the unthinkably massive amount of money disappears, and our winner spends the last of her years unsuccessfully trying to sue the lottery for ruining her life. She will have failed miserably at being rich. Having as much money as the filthy rich and elite, she will have learned the hard way that it’s impossible to buy the taste, security and grace with which the truly wealthy stroll the earth.
5. I am obsessed with cows. Especially jersey’s. I love their big brown eyes!
Ultimate & golfOriginal Frisbee Disc Sports: Ultimate & Golf
My amazing and inspiring siblings
Kissed
If the only way the Republicans can win is on the lies of Mitt Romney and by trying to elect a “hatchet man” to do away with the government offices that protect “We the People” then isn’t it time to eliminate the Republicans? We neither need to point out the truth or argue with the Republicans in regards to their denying rights to women because the facts speak for themselves whether Democrats declare it a war or not. It is an insult to the intelligence of all Americans who will vote,because we are not stupid, nor do we go into denial when we know we are being lied to. Vote for Truth and Fairness in November.
I hang up sobbing as I call this 800 number to Roadside Assistance. Michael keeps interjecting sweetly, "Mommy, did you talk to the cup-any? Did you talk to dem? Mommy?" He puts his miniature hand on my leg to comfort me.
fixed by a pull and draining away.
Alright, there’s something I’d like to share with you… again.
The pledges will be placed at the feet of Our Lady of the Taper at the National Shrine of Wales, Cardigan on Sunday 4th December and then sent to our Bishop, Bishop Thomas Burns in the form of a spiritual bouquet and petition.
Historically, on this continent Christian America adopted an open free-market approach to all religions from the beginning. American Christians then (and now) were not fearful of other religions. They were confident that Christianity would prevail on its own merits and they therefore followed the Biblical precedent set forth in both the Old and New Testaments of simply presenting God's word in a straightforward manner, expecting that the Holy Spirit will confirm His word in the hearts of hearers. Christians believe that on a level playing field, Christianity will always prevail through the voluntary choice of the people.
Former NBA star says anything he wants on race knowing little repercussion will come his way. Double-standard on race issue. He should say what he wants but so should white players.
The other day we were walking home from Prospect Park and passed by PS 130. I told my wife and son about how little Shawn Gorman scaled up the side of the school with roller skates and nothing holding him except his nerve. I think they may have chalked it up to another “tall tale” of my childhood in Brooklyn.
Yes, I do wanna run, not because I pigged out this day or I’m an athlete or something but I do wanna run as fast as I could so I can catch up with my thousand thoughts processing on my mind that time.Cause I was like an undated video card of a desktop computer that can’t be match to the latest Operating system there is.
1 acknowledged
She looked over at me, lit a cigarette, and said "No, she's some fuckin lucky I have quick reflexes, next time I'll run the bitch over, she didn't have the walk signal"
And at this point we would like to make room for the Christian re-reading (rilettura) of the Psalm by the Fathers of the Church, who saw in it a prefiguration of the Incarnation and Crucifixion, a sign of the paradoxical lordship of Christ.
I served it with dinner tonight, and all six of us agreed it was fantastic. My kids were asking me to make it for their study groups, planning meetings for graduation, Superbowl parties, etc. My only advice would be - make two loaves it goes fast.
Like two scared children, we froze before looking up. Standing behind my father was my mother.
This next bit will sound corny, and I apologize beforehand, but common, imagine you were me and your meeting your sibling for the first time!
“At the request of Russia, the U.N. Security Council held an emergency session in New York but failed to reach consensus early Friday on a Russian-drafted statement.
* And to add insult to injury, the willows and crabapples are turning green, chokeberry and serviceberry are breaking bud, the elm is blooming, and I think I saw a cicada the size of a football eating a junco (it was far away, so maybe not the case). Fall right on into summer this year. :(
I am using the Bigz Petite Purse for the first time and really enjoyed making them especially with treats. I added the flowers using the Boho Blossoms punch and using bthe It's a Wrap Holidays.
I will give a FREE copy to 2 lucky people who comment on this post...I will pick the winners tomorrow hopefully by noon. :)
DJ’s Birthday Winners:
Manuela thought to herself and smiled.
Other Festival Highlights include:
Another question out there, more immediate at the moment, is Iraq. "Should we stay in Iraq or should we get out?"
Slowly my craft room is getting a bit of a re-do.
When you start undertaking something, your motivation is at the top, as you set the bar very high. A few days or weeks later, you might not recognise your goals anymore, maybe you will think they are unreachable and you will be tempted to give up. No way!
Seeing as we are in Singapore, how much more appropriate can you get? If you are interested in the technique, let me know and I will post it here.
He claimed that only through writing could the Ugly Spirit be exorcised.
Whenever you’re not working and out and about do you visualize special effects? Like watching people swim and how to have a shark brutally attack them or visit a new city and how to demolish it?
Ten year old boy: "Who's Carla?!"
"Hi Tony,when I joined the Halifax site and saw your name I realised who you were and commented somewhere that I knew your mum. eventually I got the photos on, I have lots of the nursery but only this one with your mum on. It was Oct. 1968 when the nursery opened and I was the Nusery Nurse in charge until its close in 1974. Your mum came as a volunteer 2 sessions a week, she only stayed maybe a year or so, I really can't remember. Its funny to think I was only 18 and now turned 60, your mum must have been a good age when she passed away.I hope she had a happy life I do have fond memories of her working with me, even though it was a short time.
Zelda II: The Adventitious of Link
How many people on the Telegraph staff read this before it was published?
But I digress. Wonder Boy's tentative diagnosis, which will require a visit to a real eye doctor to confirm his near-sightedness reminds me of my acquisition of glasses in second grade. The fact that I squinted constantly was noticed by my music teacher (not my regular teachers, mind you, or my parents), and I was duly sent to an opthamologist who determined that, yes, I was blind as a bat. And he put this awful contraption on my face and played with various lenses until it seemed about right. At this point I was very concerned that these were going to be my actual glasses--the ones I had to wear for the rest of my life--but nevertheless I was convinced to go outside, where I saw the world with clarity for the first time. "Mom!" I said. "The buildings have windows!" And I realized that they had just been big blurs before. Does anyone else who got glasses as a child remember this moment? It was kind of like an acid trip. Um. Or so I've heard.
The good thing is I can see some spare time on the immediate horizon. Woohoo. I've got some ideas that I can't wait to put on paper. For now though, how about I share the October Kraft It Up challenge that went up today? This month you need to create a layout using ONE of the following styles....
Not my idea at all! I was so wonderfully helpful to my design team. When asked what I wanted my site to look like, I answered, "I dunno." So Kelli asked me to go through some templates and send her ones that I liked so she could get an idea of my tastes. After sending her a couple dozen sites, she told me, "Umm Dawn? 95% of those sites were beach related. Now I know you love the beach, but your book isn't about beaches. You don't live anywhere near a beach. I don't think that's going to be the best idea for you." Then she asked me to take a picture of my fridge and send it to her. She's a genius! Those are mostly my magnets and my kids' artwork.
Lovely topped with a little sour cream, or a spoon of yogurt, and a bit of sliced scallions.
3. Chop butter and melt it in the microwave, not entirely but to a creamy consistency
As well as a random winner being chosen each challenge one lucky player who has used a Whimsy Stamps image (rubber or digital) will have the opportunity to be a guest designer for a future challenge. The guest designer will be able to choose a digi stamp of their choice from the store to create their guest card too! Does that sound good?
Above is play on Evolon using the gelli plate - Used the Paperartsy chalk acrylics which are quite subtle and then I sprayed over with Gecko Green Glitz Spritz. I rather like it and will stitch but not today.
In recent years, Pressly has been a little less of a threat to the world, as she has been almost dressed in her ongoing role in the television series "My Name is Earl." However, she has three movies in production at the moment--including "The Oogieloves in the Big Balloon Adventure"--so she may re-emerge as a threat shortly. Who knows what calamity the immodesty of Jaime Pressly may cause in the future?
It seems this family down in Texas went out to dinner with a group of people. Also seems that the restaurant they chose to go to has a policy of adding a 17 percent tip onto table of five or more (although it doesn't say this on the link, on the news they showed the menu at the restaurant that clearly states this policy). The cheap ass people decided not to pay and got locked in the restaurant and the cops were called. First of all, bravo to the management for backing up your staff. Secondly, bravo to the cops for making them pay it.
The number would be seventy-five percent.
“John McCain…saw an opportunity here. He was quick to condemn Russia, he’s been keeping up the sort of steady drum beat. Obama a little more cautious, at least initially, in his statements. He’s since toughened up his stance. Should he have come out stronger right from the get-go?”
not so much an adventure
I made the cape of flannel, and sewed it so it would drape all around her and keep her warm and used a paw print pattern to line the bottom.
Otherwise, if anyone has good ideas on how I can sneak cake into my house… please comment and let me know. After all, I am a foodie at heart.
Thus gender identity-is learned and achieved at the interactional level, reified at the cultural level, and institutionally enforced via the family, law, religion, politics, economy, medicine, and the media.
Obama: Yes?
I don't care much about the themes of your novel. I care if it's enticing.
Bill: I suppose George Burns was the most remarkable celebrity I have ever met. The last time I saw him he was about 98 years old. He saw me and walked toward me with conviction, and then we hugged each other for at least a good 15 seconds. I shall never forget the moment, nor the feeling I had in my arms while holding his frail, skeletal body to me. He was unique, special, a comedic genius.
and I wonder what other glorious photos they took the same day.
“King Alexander sends greetings to his brother Jonathan. We have heard of you, that you are a mighty warrior and worthy to be our friend.
You’re cellophane.
For those of you in Canada, let us stand up and declare that as we are part of the True North, Strong and Free, freedom matters to us and we will take action to be a part of the change! I encourage you to attend one of these events if it is in your area, and join the facebook page to find out what else is going on in Canada with NFS.
Summary of the Book:
I know, as parents, it is tempting to think that the kids need a break, it is hard to make daily reading a priority when there is no one to be accountable to (like a teacher), and summers can be so busy!! BUT... reading daily is the most important thing you can do this SUMMER!
Frogs and snails and puppy dogs’ tails – that’s what little boys are made of.”
*I ended up adding more than 1/4 cup more all-purpose flour, but I didn’t want to add too much at the risk of my bread becoming too dense or tough once baked. It’s a rather sticky dough though so make sure you flour your work surface quite often to make things easier for you.
The trolls tell the kids that they are aliens who have been watching them. The kids weren’t born yesterday, and they know that these so called aliens are just trolling them.
"I find myself drooling, my tongue hanging out, my mouth snapping together involuntarily, twitchings – obsessive thoughts – the lewd imagination develops.
oh rising sun – oh spring dawn
I am beyond smitten with my pair of flats and I am slightly convinced that this darling shop may not only manufacture their supply but *may* also sell to high-end designers. My pair came in an unmarked box and has an area in the sole to be stamped with a brand but is blank. Hmmmmmmmm, interesting, no? .... here's a glimpse at a few other colors they offer .... so wish they would have had that delightful red in stock! Maybe next time!
to drain for about half and hour (at least). (Don’t worry if the potatoes start getting brown, it won’t make a difference once they’re baked.) Squeeze out as much liquid as you can with your hands.
In the scale of embarrassing place names, Crapstone ranks pretty high. But Britain is full of them. Some are mostly amusing, like Ugley, Essex; East Breast, in western Scotland; North Piddle, in Worcestershire; and Spanker Lane, in Derbyshire.
“Wasting away our people”
As MCM and LCM get older, I am trying to incorporate the seasons of the church year into our home life as much as possible. My desire is that we would lead a seamless life - all permeated by the presence of Christ and the life of the church. I want to create as many opportunities as possible to imitate the life of Christ in our home, so that there is no separation between what we find and feel at church and what we find and feel at home - the domestic church. Lent is one of those seasons where we have the opportunity to make the Gospel come alive for our children, and I want to take full advantage of it!
3 The New York Times on the age of the superfluous worker. America, like other modern countries, has always had some surplus workers — people ready to work but jobless for extended periods because the “job creators,” private and public, have been unable or unwilling to create sufficient jobs. When the number of surplus workers rose sharply, the country also had ways of reducing it. However, the current jobless recovery, and the concurrent failure to create enough new jobs, is breeding a new and growing surplus pool. And some in this pool are in danger of becoming superfluous, likely never to work again. The currently jobless total about 15% of the work force, not including the invisible discouraged workers the government cannot even find to count. In the old days — before Social Security, welfare and Medicaid — poverty-caused illnesses killed off or incapacitated some of the people who could not find jobs. Even earlier, some nations sold their surplus workers as slaves, while the European countries could send them to the colonies. If modern capitalism continues to eliminate as many jobs as it creates — or more jobs than it creates — future recoveries will not only add to the amount of surplus labour but will turn a growing proportion of workers into superfluous ones.
I only want to help you to remember this tragedy among so many more. I hope that we, on the outside, can never forget what normal people like all of us had to deal with, and deal with all the time.
Philadelphia
The English language is constantly changing, which is what makes it so vibrant.
i don’t like this feeling
Which must be good for Newquay?
Mam-maw was never featured on television, the movies, or on music charts. But her genuine warmth and gracious demeanor filled to overflowing every square inch of her little house on Ward Street. Each person who entered her front door was greeted by a heartfelt hello, and asked earnestly about their week. It wasn't a courtesy question; she cared. She knew the interests, likes, and dislikes of every member of her family. Again, it may seem simple, but try talking to forty people at once sometime, and making each one feel that they're the most important person in the world. That's not a skill that can be learned; it's a gift borne of selflessness.
The Minister said the draft Bill would be presented to the Cabinet next month and that it was backed by President Mahinda Rajapaksa who had received complaints of substandard programmes being aired. It is a major concern now, the minister said.
Of course, we also picked my sister and her friend up from the second and last day of the anime convention. Once again, they chattered all the way home. They spent the whole day hanging out with some new friends, and seemed to quite enjoy themselves.
Talking to the Taliban does not mean recognising their humanity, however. The BBC reported last month:
Now of course we can’t talk about a cemetery and leave out the spooky stuff. During the time of the cemetery’s founding, doctors hadn’t quite devised ways of discerning a death from a concussion. When they would open a tomb to place a new body in it, sometimes there would be a skeleton outside of the coffin and scratch marks on the inside of the tomb’s door… i.e. someone got buried alive. To counteract this, they started tying a string connected to a bell on the outside of the tomb. They then employed a person to stay at the cemetery all night, later dubbed the graveyard shift, to listen for the bell in case he needed to open the tomb in a hurry. If you woke up in a tomb, rang the bell and were heard, you were saved by the bell.
And then, as they say...
I was playing with my camera settings while waiting for several people to "walk out of my picture", when suddenly a man yelled at me "stop taking pictures of me". I was absolutely shocked at his tone and tried to explain that I didn't take any pictures of him, that in fact I was waiting for an "empty" scenery, but he went on ranting. In the end, I just ignored him, took my picture - which then was totally uninspired - and walked on.
We also learned some more about shapes with our project. Buses are rectangles and wheels are circles, etc. We cut out a big rectangle for the bus and some circles for the wheels, some squares for the windows and glued them all to a piece of construction paper. Then Nathan drew people in the windows. He also remembered that school buses have a stop sign on them, so he drew one on his bus. And asked me to write "stop" on it.
You may have heard the old adage, 'one swallow doesn't make a summer', but what about 300 or more? Given the exceptionally wet weather recently (following a dry winter and an unusually hot early spring leading to drought), the feeling that summer might be coming is certainly a pleasant one, even though objectively the rain is welcome in farms and gardens. So, while spending the weekend at Downton for the Cuckoo Fair, although I'd been seeing small numbers for a few weeks, it was good to see a more sizeable flock of swallows (Hirundo rustica) that had just arrived...
“I’m looking for Thorn,” he said in a whiskey-rough voice.
No one can discover these sponsoring beliefs except for you. Only you lived through your life. Only you made the choice to believe that one is better than another. And only you can decide that if your past choice no longer holds true for you today, that it is time to choose again.
About the new Mass translation to be implemented in just a few short weeks.
The neurologist ordered a CAT scan and did some tests. There was significant brain damage, but as of Saturday morning the neurologist wanted to give it another 24 hours before passing judgment.
And it appears that Stafford should only get even better for the Lions.
and continued health and happiness throughout 2012.
20. Who did you miss?
Here they are with there new home high in the sky.
“I knew that you would like it as soon as I seen it, you are my daughter and just because I haven’t been as involved in your everyday life as I should have does not mean that I don’t know you.”
An alchemic mastermind
Heres a run down how we did this baby.
The closest Bob has to a real example in this list is Matt 16:3: "And in the morning, 'There will be a storm today, for the sky is red and threatening.' Do you know how to discern the appearance of the sky, but cannot discern the signs of the times?” But there, our Lord explicitly says that we are discussing the “appearance of the sky” and so this is not a real parallel. Similarly, Luke 12:54 says, “"When you see a cloud rising in the west, you say at once, 'A shower is coming'; and so it happens.” But this is not phenomenological language at all, it’s literal—a thunderhead literally rises up and you know it’s going to rain. So none of Bob's examples are actual examples of phenomenological language and therefore none of them are pertinent examples.
But with identity formation, the devil is in the detail, isn´t it? It is die Kleinigkeiten, the little things, that turn out to be not so little when it comes to making someone feel as part of the group—or outside of it. It’s the thing we do as much as the things we fail to do, like writing official forms in a language that is inclusive rather than divisive.
You can see where this is going, can't you? Hahaha - you have NO IDEA!!!
Not long ago I was walking down the sidewalk in my town to go get my car. I was holding a folding chair in my gun hand. A car slow rolled past me with 4 heads in it. The guys in the back seat turned around as they went by looking at me. They went a little farther and U turned in the street.
Others try to differentiate themselves by presentation (Crystal Head for example) but when Beam Inc. introduced low-cal vodka called Skinnygirl following the success of its other “diet” ready-to-drink cocktail line, I had to give it a shot. I bypassed their flavored line (cucumber, tangerine and coconut) and went straight for bare naked or unflavored… To my surprise, it was quite refreshing on the rocks with the usual ever-so-present trace of ethanol note but with minimal other-than impurities, all with 20% less calories. The product also gets thumbs up for its efforts to expand the segment and further differentiate itself by catering to those who are health-conscious (is that an oxymoron?) or at least weight-conscious. While the Skinnygirl gets thumbs up from me, at the end of the day, I prefer my spirits fully leaded…
3. If the mixture isn’t quite dropping consistency, add a splash of milk and mix it in.
This made the store quite unique and exciting for everyone who walked in, but also made it really stood out from the rest of the crowd.One could find everything from pink YSL coat, to Marc by Marc Jacobs caftandress and early H&M garments.
Of course after the credits, Scream becomes an entirely different movie. Not a bad movie, as I insisted for awhile (After all I did mark another moment from the film as one of my scariest moments). But just another slasher, albeit a well written and directed one. Ironic for a movie (rightfully) labeled the post modern horror film that Scream should start with sequence of such unabashed reality. That was what Scream promised, a horror movie played real. It could have been great, it settled for good.
“Hector? We’re home early.”
One day my dad called on phone. He wanted to ask if we could video chat. As I was busy doing something, I gave the phone to Cheebu.
Meanwhile, today I'll be showing you a polish that matches very well the here, in Toulouse, at this moment: rainy ,windy, gray-ishy, gloomy.. all of that!
The Renz Family
Bake at 350 degrees F for 30-35 minutes.
It was a lot cleaner and in much better condition that both me and Neil expected. In fact, it was almost up to just being MOT’d and Taxed and sold! It is straight, clean and well tidy.
forget the children.
I did, however, find out that I have a knack for making babies fall asleep. One of my best friends, who taught me how to let loose my hair (for better or worse, but mostly better) and definitely taught me how to party (got me drunk the first time I was really drunk) has also had a baby, about 3 months ago, a little girl. And I can tell you she is her mothers daughter. She will do what she wants and no amount of routine or good intentions are going to change that. By best friend and her boyfriend, and my Irish friend and her husband all came to mom's on Sat for Christmas dinner (I had been deprived of Christmas dinner at Christmas, so that was my only wish). My best friend had had her daughter for the 3 month health check and the baby had been vaccinated. As a result my best friend brought the baby with her. I managed to get her to fall asleep twice :D
A Blue Moon occurs when the moon with its 28 day cycle appears twice within the same calendar month. Many consider theBlue Moon to be a goal moon where you set specific goals for yourself.
Few people like change, but if your website isn’t built around how people search, you’ll need to revise it. Yes, that’s going to cost some money and/or effort, but having a site that is persuasive, branded, easy to navigate, and socially active is key to success in today’s competitive market. A good starting point is determining what you want your site to do. Are you directly selling goods or services? Are you using your site to generate leads? Maybe you’re only providing contact information. The point is to be clear so that your customers and prospects know what you want them to do.
Oh dear. Mrs Angry was reminded of this, during the last week or so, when reading the rather comical efforts by our little Tory councillor Robert Rams, clutching a sticky little brush, hands dripping with green and black paint, to pretend that Barnet Council's new, disastrous, town centre killing parking schemes that have enraged residents all over the borough were absolutely nothing to do with him.
Beer isn't political. But beer companies certainly can be. As soon as I started this blog, I was made aware of several instances in which beer companies had been openly supportive of some very unsavory activities. For example, Miller Brewing was taken to task by the Catholic League for its support of some homosexual advocacy and the appropriation of its logo to an advertisement what was openly offensive to Christians. Thankfully, this particular controversy ended with Miller doing the right thing by publicly apologizing.
I hope that you enjoyed my card today and I wiould love to hear from you so please leave me a comment if you have time =)
Prayer works, my friends! I am living proof. I have faced death, or the possibility of it, head on (twice, actually). If it weren't for the prayers that were flooding the gates of heaven, I believe that I would be there now. While I have high aspirations of that being my eternal home, I was not ready to leave my husband, my babies, my family, and my friends behind. I begged, I pleaded, and God heard my cries...OUR cries. Thank you, from the bottom of my heart!
So, a demain...
Be the writer.
1. Marika Vera Caroline Stretch Tulle Bodysuit - A super sexy bodysuit with an unusual neckline and exposed back that can be dressed up or down to suit the venue.
Something luminous?
Weekly Wisdom: I'm all out of wisdom this week.
Malchus crossed the street and ran down a different one. He jogged to a tanner’s booth and asked one question. He was pointed in the right direction and he ran off.
My youngest brother will be living with me. He'll be moving in in June, once he gets his business dealings all settled and changes from self-employed to a salaried employee (yay! for benefits!). His health isn't great and sharing a place with him will mean that if he needs help, I will be there for him. It will be nice to have some company and I know Pips will thoroughly enjoy having a second lap to ensconce herself on. He loves cats, so these two will not be an issue.
We have been having technical difficulties with our website today, so if you have been hearing from school councils that they can’t get online to do the survey, they’re right. It is up and running again now, and the bonus is that you have a whole extra month to get those surveys in.
quoting seinfeld and the office
Snowing on Raton by The Flatlanders
16. Antena - Seaside Week End
And you know all it took? Someone having confidence in me and listening to me and respecting my opinions and experience at this place. Someone treating me like I may actually have something valuable to add to the conversation. Someone trusting me.
“You think things that should not be thought and speak conscious words (pragnyaa vaadaan), the panDitas (learned) do not differentiate between those who have gone (passed away) and those who have not. Neither I, nor you, nor these kings have a beginning or an end. There was not a moment when we came into existence and there is not a moment when we shall cease to be. Just as the ones who have a body experience childhood, youth and old age thus shall an another body be attained. Therefore the intelligent are not taken up (muhyati) by this. Sensations and perceptions, like cold and heat, that give comfort and sadness are transient, just tolerate them!
- Painted fingers and toes
I'm incredibly grateful for the relationship I have with my parents, and that my parents are the people that they are.
Every day is hard.
Though people don’t think about setting a lot, it’s important. It determines what you’ll wear and what you will bring. It is insignificant to our minds, but to a writer’s mind and their book, it determines pretty much everything.
I hope this letter finds you well out of harm's way
a consolation of home-baked cookies in their hands
The above linked article is from January of this year, but it is still very relevant to what is happening on the ground with Michelle Rhee’s StudentsFirst group.
and that something would be my inspiration or mojo or whatever you want to call it - anyone found it wandering loose anywhere?
8) The physical book. It’s not that I don’t love them. I want bookstores to sell lots of physical books. But alas, the experts keep predicting their demise and last I heard, sales were down 40 percent. Therefore we sadly downgrade physical books to: The Hallmark Card Section of the Grocery Store. People who care, still want to send the very best. We will now stop with this analogy as we are sniffling.
This month Jill and Mel said we could choose exactly what we wanted for our design team kit. Well, I think I surprised Jill by choosing an older range rather than one of the newest ones. I absolutely loved the bright summer colours of the Bella BLVD papers and the so shouted my name.
In reference to the much discussed closing sequence, the film’s production notes allude to a ‘tsunami of vomit’. That’s possibly the first time the words ‘tsunami’ and’vomit’ have appeared together in the same sentence. That’s probably a good thing.
KARMA baby, KARMA
Then, we come out of the woods when Ryan calls for us
KUALA LUMPUR, Aug 17 — DAP publicity chief Tony Pua called Datuk Seri Liow Tiong Lai a “very poor health minister” for not releasing an overdue report on the use of tear gas and water cannon outside Tung Shin Hospital in the July 9 Bersih rally.
Transdermal medicine is an effective way of administering remedies rapidly.
Victor’s backup plan involved a cloned version of himself, and this being has relocated to a small city in Montana where he has been slowly but surely replacing all key inhabitants with the latest version on his New People. This version of Victor, who styles himself Victor Leben or Victor Immaculate, works from a lab in a surplus underground missile complex and, while he may have all the intelligence of the original model, also had amplified versions of all Victor’s flaws.
Is it really Saturday already??? It's been a crazy week and I'm not sure I actually accomplished anything! I did have to get my daughter ready to go and on a plane back across the country for her sophomore year of college. Sad day. Sad week. That actually took up most of my free time between doctor appointments, haircuts, clothes shopping, helping her with her packing job, and of course the drive to the airport. I only made it into the classroom twice this week...and only furthered the mess I think. Boo.
Thank you ALL for your entries.
Ripples follow Alice into Abacus
I was like, "Ok, so why didn't they do this medley at the beginning of the show, and then skip the show itself.....that way I could have been out of here hours ago?"
They did the whole shoot in her (and Nora's) room, and let me tell you, the room is small. Furniture was moved into the hall and into my office, cribs were moved around, shelves were redecorated, and lights were put up in her room and outside her window. I'm sure the neighbors were wondering what on Earth was going on.
And I will,
The unkind thoughts of others which we find in people’s minds we should seek to change into kindly thoughts.
Me, Neil and our dedicated friend Shannon (who does not love chicken, she’s more of a beef/sausage kinda gal)
But Ruby has a darker side, a side she doesn’t show anyone—not even Stella. As Stella watches her friend slowly unravel, she will have to search deep inside herself for the strength to be a true friend, even if it means committing the ultimate betrayal.
Brief Digression Number One: Every season The Citadel loses in the SoCon tourney and sets a new NCAA record for most consecutive conference tournament appearances without winning a title – and every season, the following week Clemson ties the record (which is currently 55) when the Tigers lose in the ACC tournament. Of course, Clemson came close to breaking its string of futility last year. Incidentally, The Citadel’s 58-56 win over Clemson in 1979 is the last victory for the Bulldogs over a current member of the Atlantic Coast Conference. The Citadel is 24-55 against Clemson, alltime. Seven of those wins came after the Tigers joined the ACC. Those are the only victories The Citadel has against a school that was a member of the ACC at the time.
This is the time to be selfish and unsure and pick the wrong city and forget to turn off the AC when I leave my apartment. Because, oh man, this is also the time when I'm supposed to figure out what I'd like to do with my life... and if I don't make lots and lots of hot messes along the way, how the heck would I ever know what I want?
Hi there again. Really I was so happy and thankful for all the lovely and sweet compliments of you ladies!!
10 others
I was given a Pong case to review, but have not been paid to write about it. As always, my opinions are my own and are always honest.
I’m out of sticky notes again.
Memento ink pads for edges of layers.
The more adventurous or those with time on their hands can peruse the multitude of options for alternative medicine. These include several clinics ran by hippies where the treatments vary from virtual massage to the prescribing of potent elixirs. Ineffectual as these treatments are, gullible punters will con themselves into feeling better, having parted with half their annual income (or trust fund) to pay for it. The hippies have made a packet from selling these treatments to the downshifters from London, who also buy copious amounts of magic aromatherapy oils and enchanted crystals in the belief that it will bring them eternal life.
Ellinee This is a great blog that provides free printable stationary and templates for making gorgeous paper crafts ideal for your wedding, baby shower, or any party. They have some incredibly awesome stuff that’s totally worth checking out.
Now Will and his best friend and neighbor, Gretchen, are starting a new summer. Gretchen seems troubled—her sleepwalking habit is getting worse, and she keeps waking up closer and closer to the water. Will is drawn to Asia, the exotic new girl in town. Nobody knows where she's from—all Will knows is that her beauty and her mesmerizing voice have a powerful effect on people.
There is seldom anything new under the sun – but I have never heard of anyone else doing what I saw and I have certainly never seen it before.
A few of the interesting speciality beer shops from Cologne are listed, including Bier Zwerg which has a great selection for this part of the world, and Bierkompass which I will be browsing very shortly! I'll be taking a peek at whatever stand the Association of Home and Hobby Brewers of Germany, a 500-strong community, will have will have at the festival, mostly out of curiosity about what do German home brewers brew, and do they really use washing machines?
If eating patterns in the 1960s set the county on a path of future health problems, they also spawned America's first significant weight loss regiment. Betty, mortified by her extra pounds and judging herself against the lanky frame of her ex-husband's new wife, turns to a community group that would grow to become the most successful weight loss program of the 20th century -- Weight Watchers, a Queens-based company formed in 1963 that brought weight control to the mainstream.
Fast forward to yesterday. Arrangements were made for the family to pick up their Christmas items from the volunteer's office. When they arrived the mom and grandmother were shocked to see all of the wonderful items these angels had provided for them, from baby clothes and diapers galore, to a winter coat that was so desperately needed for the mom, this family felt the love of Christ through the generosity of others.
Foreigner – Double Vision
3) Style Gurus
It is pathetic, but imperative to note that despite the extensive layers of governmental “child protection” services that were activated, and the girls' school officials (alleged) concern about their welfare, multiple police visits and repeat calls to 911 that three Shafia girls and one hapless, polygamous wife ended up dead at the bottom of cold waters in Kingston.
Def Leppard , Faith No More , Gary Moore , Guns N’ Roses
Visually the movie is fine, and I’ll give Nimziki some credit that the movie didn’t look like ass. Well it looks okay for what budget he had; however there are some special effects that just look really bad. An explosion just looks like it’s layered over footage, and some of the werewolves look like BATS! You see there are alpha wolves that look like actual werewolves, and all the others are werebats. God damn it how hard is it to make werewolves look like werewolves. I shouldn’t even need to say that, but there you have.
A combination of work stress, long periods sitting and poor posture constricts our muscles and our breath and can result in aches, pain, fatigue and a loss of energy that makes it harder to get our work done.
I actually feel a bit 'naked' posting this pic. I'm not really one to have a 'glowing and healthy' look after exercise. More like a dripping, weirdly splotched beetroot really.
One more note, a personal point of privilege, on essays. This month, Cincinnati Magazine published an essay I wrote about voyeurism and online house-hunting. (It’s on newsstands this week.) It’s the first time I’ve been published. I doubt I’ll ever publish a collection of essays, but if I do, you can bet that I’ll cite Sullivan as an influence.
Ten standard reviews to get through backlog (Yes, I have a big backlog of read books to be reviewed!)
Arty had seen the program once already and was not consciously watching it the current time around. His body was made to take in the sights and sounds and translate them into information and he could not halt that process; however, he did his best to ignore it.
Unlike over 90 percent of Republican writers, Malkin has for years been good on immigration, but she’s so lazy and dishonest on race that every time she writes on the subject, she causes damage to public discourse, through misleading her hundreds of thousands of newspaper and Web readers.
I look out through the black tinted windows to see Darren and Tracy locked in a passionate kiss. The blood from his nose mixing with his dearly beloveds splattered lipstick.
It’s the week before spring break and I just had a student leave my classroom to vomit; when she came back she was shaking and in tears and I had to send her home. Another won’t come at all this week because her grandmother is sick and she doesn’t feel like it. We are halfway in and she’s already missed the equivalent of two weeks of course time. I had seven absences from one class at the start of this week. Many students don’t even bother to email me and try to get the missed work; they just stroll into class and ask casually, “So, um, what did I miss last time?”
Languages are meant to bring cohesiveness to common groups and to communicate with outsiders. Human language is a learned symbolic communication system. Teaching the English language, I find that new words are invented daily and the meanings of old ones have changed.
I’m choosing to have faith in my journey.
Jack has made a name for himself with some excellent work digging through old film and telling the stories of some key figures in Norwood history, educating and entertaining townspeople and preserving these productions for future generations. Under his guidance, NPA has produced special documentaries on several folks including former major league baseball player Richie Hebner ( arguably Norwood’s most favorite son,) and Colonel George Lee, a Norwood native turned heroic fighter pilot in World War II. I hadn’t heard of Lee until the special, and now because of Jack’s research and discovery of rare old film, Lee is a household name in town, as he should be.
"I did do something," Rachel said, and knew her time had come. "Remember? I made breakfast this morning." As she predicted, her mother couldn't come up with a fighting response. Rachel won...that round at least.
One might blame it on global warming, but that’s merely an excuse. We spend less time outdoors now as a culture than we ever did. Despite ‘power runs’, jogging, (with natural sounds deadened by earphones strapped to head) and weekend walks (complete with cellphone), we are constantly reminded by the technology of our own devising that we are no longer creatures of the corn.
When The Sea is Rising Red
And as for the PA, they have verbally recognized Israel's right to exist, in English, but Fatah, who runs the Palestinian Authority never has. They have never renounced violence. In fact, they celebrate and honor its practitioners in their mosques, schools and media, pay salaries to terrorists convicted of murdering civilians in Israeli jails and have never implemented their part of the Road Map.
In doing so, they set the music world on fire. And jazz just had another category to fit into its part of that world.
Weary and burdened. I think no one is immune to those. We so often carry burdens. Life here in the world can be hard. Deadlines, bonds, education, health, family, provision, decisions, worry, need for safety… all of it creates stress.
Thank you mt! Thank you Kawai-san and Kanae-san and thank you everyone for coming along and making mt craft with me.
The past 4 days have been wonderful. I was worried about it when I wrote the last post. Wasn't sure I was up to it. I'm a homebody right now (and really aways have been, but....). I tend to whine a lot, and feel sorry for myself WAY too much. Sometimes I'm just really pathetic.
like masks, peel on and off. And it’s like this:
I told her after the hand spanking that since she was bad I had to reinforce the seriousness of what she had done. She asked, " What are you going to do ?" I reached over and found a slipper on the floor I wore when I got up in the morning. She said, "you're not, NO, please Rich don't use that shoe on my butt, PLEASE !!!" I told her, she didn't it and think about it as I slipper you. With that I brought the slipper down, on the middle of her bottom, four rapid fire spanks. " OHHHHH, AHHHHH, NOOOOO, OHHHHHH !!!!' The it was over. She laid over my lap, breathing heavily. She said in a low voice, you know what this means. I let her up, she continued to remove the lower portion of her clothing. Smiling at me, she took my hand as I got up off the floor. Nodding her head towards the bed room we moved into what usually were my sleeping quarters,but on this night I knew sleep was out of the question. I looked at the clock ad it was 1:00 AM. I'll leave the rest of the night to your imagination. As the night progressed my next moment of reality was to see the sun had risen, it was 6:00 AM. Needless to say, I never made it to work that day !!!!
#3 – Radiata Stories (PS2)
When roaming Barcelona, your ears will inevitably pick up on the Catalan language. What the majority of travellers that pass through Barcelona don’t realize is that they are on Catalonia soil now. A nation that has been, and still is, awaiting the day to find its independence from Spain.
Stamp: C.C. Design
Faced with the inevitability of death for all of us, Beloved and I embraced each other for comfort, and, as we have often done before, we swore again never to sleep on a row, to try kindness in place of harsh words, and laugh and cry together rather than alone. I doubt that we will manage to keep yesterday's vow anymore than we have kept similar vows in the past, but we will try.
So far I'm about 100 pages into the 1972-73 volume (all grading has been put on hold) and the letters are extremely interesting and shed a lot of light on that particular time in Dick's life: he's just moved to Fullerton from Vancouver; he's broke, alone, and emerging from the darkest year of his life. Letters to lawyers, friends and family, chicks, agents, all delve at length into Dick's problems, interestingly, in almost equal detail whether he's chronicling his troubles to life long friend Ray Nelson, or the snuff vendor, settling up after a check bounced. The writing is incredibly good, in places as funny and as devastating as any of his novels.
Convince the countries we're a cancer over population
I tiptoed out of the party after dessert, and as I rode the subway back to the studio for a late night of work I couldn't help but think back to some of the magical desert dinners P. and I enjoyed with friends and strangers in Joshua Tree. To be honest, when we left the desert I feared we'd never find that same sense of community again, ever, period, end of story. And yet Sunday's dinner in Brooklyn was one of the most magical nights in my adult life, and, for what it's worth, only further proves my hypotheses that any social event in which whiskey sours are served is going to be a wholelotta fun. (Although to be perfectly honest the thought of meeting a bunch of people I only knew via the internet initially made me break out in high school reunion-style social anxiety-induced hives.) It wasn't just a good time; muggles, I was totally blown away and inspired.
While some people have their imperfections, and when put together still look stunning, mine just make me look imperfect.
433 Hay St. Room 309 ___________
Please say yes.
"Gosh, that's certainly a drink," said Leiter.
Poehler: Hi.
Another soup I made with a twist on a roasted mushroom recipe with garlic and fennel. I figured it was a good base with lots of flavor. I actually took some photos…
Biological systems, like machines, have…functions and forms inexplicable by chemical and physical laws. The argument that the DNA molecule determines genetic processes in living systems does not indicate reducibility. A DNA molecule essentiality transmits information to a developing cell. Similarly, a book transmits information. But the transmission of the information cannot be represented in terms of chemical and physical principles. In other words, the operation of the book is not reducible to chemical terms. Since DNA operates by transmission of (genetic) information, its function cannot be described by chemical laws either. The life process is essentially the development of a fertilized cell, as the result of information imparted by DNA. Transmission of this information is nonchemical and nonphysical, and is the controlling factor in the life process. The description of a living system therefore transcends the chemical and physical laws which govern its constituents.”[2]
003.085 YUSUFALI: If anyone desires a religion other than Islam (submission to Allah), never will it be accepted of him; and in the Hereafter He will be in the ranks of those who have lost (All spiritual good).
- Lee Yong Jo (Kyuhyun’s friend)
Now, to tackle this corner. In my defense, the large box that you can't really see next to the wheelchair is the bunny cave. It holds the shower chair that Duane never used. The bunnies have chewed themselves an entrance and exit holes. They say we can send the chair back, but they are keeping the box. (That's a post for another day.) Mostly, it's book boxes back there. Just a yarn tote, the big box in front of the chair and the bookcase needs sorted.
I have a paper to write and a conference presentation before month’s end. Not to mention a second interview/site visit to attend out of state in a couple of weeks. Somehow, I don’t think I could just call them and advise I can’t attend the interview because it’s preferable for me to lie in bed staring at the wall.
4). Better Notification Center Management: The Notification Center is an excellent update on iOS 5. What is lacking, however, is a better system to manage the notifications from Mail, iMessage, Facebook, Twitter etc. Adding such advanced controls where we can reply back, manage and control the notifications and actions right from the center would be great.and if it could also include notifications by time not by app so it’s more organized not sectionized.
Pearl: Recollections
Monday 21st - 6pm -
Interestingly enough, the host star, GJ 667C, is a member of a triple-star system. GJ 667C is an M-class dwarf star that is about a third of the mass of the sun, and while it is faint, it can be seen by ground-based telescopes, Vogt said.
Many of our contemporary winter holiday traditions derive from Saturnalia’s pagan roots, including the hanging of wreaths and garlands, donations to the needy, prayers for peace, time off work to be enjoyed with family, and of course eating, drinking and merriment.
Now this is not a straw-man, because there are serious historians and theologians who have offered and defended the swoon hypothesis. But it is nevertheless a very odd argument; essentially, the apologist is saying that if you accept John 19:34 as literally true, then you have to believe Jesus died on the cross. Well, sure. But if John 19:34 is evidence, why not just quote John 19:30, which says that Christ “gave up his spirit” on the cross? Why not just quote John 3:16 and be done with it?
Hypatia, an independent, learned woman, has earned the hatred of the misogynistic faith. As friends try to encourage her to convert she accuses them of “peddling faith,” forcing public baptism in exchange for permitting such ones to keep living. Then she tells a former student:
A good tape recorder is essential. I once listened to someone sob their heart out over a failed relationship. At one level I wanted to stop and hug her, at the other I knew what she was telling me would make terrific copy so didn’t want her to stop. When she’d finished and recovered herself, I discovered my tape had broken, so I had to ask her to repeat the whole story which, to her eternal credit, she did.
According to the two senior administration officials who briefed reporters, Obama hasn’t made any decisions about the size of any post-2014 force. That will come in another accord that the U.S. and Afghanistan will now negotiate – one that the aides said would alleviate “anxiety in the region” about the U.S.’ future plans.
I'm now in a bar, watching the news on the corner television. I'm seeing what seems to be a zombie. The newscaster is explaining that the cause of the zombie infestation is due to the hygiene nanites battling the body's own micro-organisms.
WASHINGTON – The Pentagon has suspended a course for military officers that officials say contained inflammatory material about Islam.
14. Jim Lauderdale - Don't Give A Hang
Rafe bordered on a bit of asshole-ness for a good bit of the text. But he never crossed the line into a territory in which I disliked him, or his decisions. Rafe always seemed to come through in the end. By the time the whole dream-prophesy hits…you’ll be rooting for the guy. Because Rafe has had some drama in his life, made a mistake or two, but he really deserved happiness and so does Gwenyth. You’ll really want them to find that happiness together.
The current typhoon which has closed all schools in Nagoya today has once again seen incidences of people being washed away by swollen rivers. The most tragic example happened yesterday when an 8 year old boy on his way home from school was lost to river flooding in Tajimi, north of Nagoya.
been taught by everyone and their dog but were dropped a long time ago
Hendrix has an even, soothing voice. He cares greatly about marriage, believes God is present in couplings that thrive. “All my life I’ve been interested in changing the world. I think what’s happened is that my focus has shifted from getting people to God, to getting people to love each other – and when they love each other, actually we think God shows up in that relationship.”
Anyone who's known me for a while is familiar with my handbag saga. I am not a purse person; I have always found purses to be more accessory than I want. Need to stash my stuff? That's what pockets are for.
In addition to her role credits, Carlie loves to sing, dance, and act. She is a student at South Side High School where she has participated in productions and student led directed plays. Carlie has a special love for plays, which shines through in her acting ability; she is a natural on stage.
Of course, there are limits, and Elon may be reaching them. Lambert suggests the goals contained in the next strategic plan will cost at least $500 million, which is a lot of money, especially when you consider that 46% of Elon’s 24,000 living alums have graduated within the past 10 years. The school has tapped a lot of old money already, but the new money won’t be coming in for quite a while, at least from alumni.
One of my favorite things to eat is seaweed salad. I usually buy sun dried wakame and make my own. I had this the other night...
It didn't help matters that I was sleep deprived. Except when I cut off shopping to head home to bed, turns out I couldn't sleep. I spent Friday putting up my Christmas decorations. And cleaning. And anything else I could think of that OMG absolutely had to be done.
IT WAS NOT A NUCLEAR ATTACK
talked about a movie and posted the trailer. The movie was called "The Troll Hunter", a Norwegian production. The trailer was captivating and I knew I wanted to see this movie.(click here to watch trailer). Well, fast forward to present day and frankly I had completely forgotten about The Troll Hunter. But then, guess what? Browsing through the cable channels the other night, lo, and behold, there it was. So I set the movie to record on the good old DVR, and the next night, my hubby and I sat down to watch.
Here are some of the key workouts I've done over the last two weeks.
There are many ways of cooking this wonderful Indonesian healthy food made from soya beans. Tempeh can be cut into thin slices and fried in batter just like ubi goreng (fried sweet potato). The crispy tempeh can be eaten plain or with spicy chilly sauce. Alternatively it can also be part of your regular dishes to be eaten with rice.
But he branded outbursts by some of the men claiming the prosecution was racially-motivated ‘nonsense’, telling them they found themselves in the dock because of their ‘lust and greed’.
the beginning. The adorable lad has played helpless Richard in THE PILLARS OF THE EARTH only to be noticed there by the producers of PIRATES OF THE CARIBBEAN ON STRANGER TIDES who then decided that he shall replace Orlando Bloom in the famous franchise. You will see him this summer next to Charlize Theron and Chris Hunksworth in SNOW WHITE AND THE HUNTSMAN where he, naturally, plays the prince. And now, according to latest news, Sam Claflin will also star in THE QUIET ONES. The supernatural thriller, inspired by true events, will tell the story of an unorthodox, but charismatic Professor (Jared Harris from MAD MEN) who uses controversial methods and leads his best students off the grid to take part in a dangerous experiment: to create a poltergeist from negative human energy.
Anwaar: Azlah has made us. Azlah created us. Azlah does not make mistakes when he creates beings. We must have been created for a purpose and that purpose is to share the same dignity that is given to men.
Like a wizard casting:
Here's some new fantastic blog links for you to check out! I've really enjoyed browsing them all, and I think you will too. :)
To be quite frank, I am glad we live in a society where people are free to take these extreme positions, but it gets my goat when they confuse the rest of us and stop a normal and friendly interchange between science and religion taking place. Most people see a place for both, and see them helping us sort out what life is about in complementary ways. I certainly do. who really wants to reduce love to sex? Having a family to passing on your genes? Making friends to a covert strategy for survival? Truth to what we can put in an equation or reproduce in an experiment? Beauty to the prejudice of the beholder?
We have several theories of what's causing the elevated level. We are pumping him full of water today to see if it's simply dehydration. It could be because he just came off of his Prednisone. The tricky thing about Prograf is that anything and everything can make this level unhappy. It's kind of a pain in the butt to be honest.
As an admittedly rabid fan of Futurama, I have always wanted to do a bit of a tongue-in-cheek piece on the 'Stop-and-Drop' Suicide Booths in the cartoon series. I think we don't treat death with sufficient humour - and the few that do, probably do it more for the ripples of muffled indignant gasps than as a real opener to discourse on the topic.
Is it fair to pump a beer full of flavour adding elements to take away from what it should be in the first place?.... I'm not really bothered. At first I didn't want to like this beer, but by the end of it I was kinda in love with it. Is that what strong beer does to you? Well if so, that's part of their charm I guess.
Fans of the book, I have something to say to you:
new school books and new classes to incite my mind to think
9.) I make the best carrot cake in all the world!
Today we had our first ever Japanese lesson in Japan, and i saw Nuno Bettencourt without a shirt on.
15 to 4 P.M.
We hear about an Iranian with an import/ export business and in need of foreign currency. We make contact and agree the transfer amount, time scale and exchange rate. We send funds from the UK to a bank account in Holland. Someone else send Rials to someone in Tehran who brings the cash to us. The exchange involves numerous parties; it is done on trust. Having spent two months in Iran, we are not unduly worried, but even if we were, there is no alternative.
And politicians like it just fine.
From Army.MilJOINT BASE LEWIS-McCHORD, Wash. (April 26, 2012) -- Joint Base Lewis-McChord will soon be home to the headquarters of the 7th Infantry Division, Secretary of the Army John McHugh announced today.
“There aren’t any others. It’s just you two, me, the cook and five porters.”
3. The Mint Julep
06 This Business Of Love
Add 3.25 gallons water and wort to brew kettle (for a total of around 5.5 gal.), add DME and stir, heat to a boil, add hops at intervals above. At about 15 min. add a 1 tsp of Irish Moss to help with clarity, at about 5 min. left add sugar. After boil is finished let sit for about 20 min. to aid in hop flavor.
We used to love on winter nights
Where to begin? Firstly, there is nothing new about this sort of pop reference in poetry. Gargoyle has been publishing work like this for two decades. Most slam poets have mined this. David Trinidad in America, and David McGimpsey, in Canada, are geniuses at this combination of TV, film, and poetic reference. Indeed, I edited a "B-poetry" anthology of pop sci-fi poems half a decade or more ago. In fact, the default position of most poets born since 1976 is to include or reference, pop culture with their poetry. It is true that few such earlier books have been marketed with quite the brazen simplicity of this new one, which wears its sleeve on its heart, as it were. However, from what I have seen of "new readerships" for poetry, they don't exist. This is for two reasons: 1) the nature of poetry is that, however much it seeks to, or seems to, pander to pop culture desires, it always, if actual poetry, exceeds those pleasures and makes demands that prove resistant to mere consumerist impulse; and 2) the nature of readers is that those who love poetry inevitably seek more and deeper pleasures than mere surface pop culture skits and pastiche; and those who don't move on to books, games, TV, films, and other online entertainments, instead.
25 cent pack - clearance sale at Michael's
white scalloped card blank
We interrupt this previously scheduled bedroom re-do to rock out.
Pale rain over the dwindling harbor
I first met with Simmons 5 years ago, upon the release of his book Twilight In The Desert. His theory, that Saudi Arabia’s (and the world’s) top field Ghawar was about to keel over and die, enraged the Saudis. The Kingdom has since spent billions of dollars bolstering its reserves and capacity – in part to prove Simmons and all the other worryworts wrong.
You take the trouble to construct a civilization, to build a society based on the principles of... of principle.
I have recently been thinking a lot about YA and how some books have gone mainstream because they have been adapted into films or have been optioned. i don't know if it is just me but do some people feel a bit of...i cannot think of the word to describe the feeling that something special is being taken away. It is always cool to find a person who has read YA book you have read but when you get a new fandom thrown in from the movies and now it is available to everybody is their a bit of resentment? Like do you feel that this was mine first and now everybody else has it but does not appreciate it the same way? Maybe it is just me being selfish or childish in a way but once a book hits a certain level of popular culture it becomes distorted and not so special anymore. Does anyone feel this way or it is just me?
9-What do you think about Dède’s misfortune and fate? Do you see an eerie similarity between her love life and her mother’s?
I’ve also finally bit the bullet and had a go at felting my work intentionally! I produced a beautiful gadget case using Adriafil Carnival yarn. It was a challenge doing the maths, adding 30% more stitches and 10% more rows to allow for shrinkage and then hoping the finished case was the right size but it worked! And I loved making it so watch out for more felted items from me!
14:50: Chaouachi highlights the huge differences between hookah and tobacco - distance of smoke, temperature, constituent chemicals, duration of smoke, and addictive nature or lack of it - and yet tobacco controllers still cannot distinguish between the two.
As I've said about a million times, I have nothing against web advertising other than to call out the bullshit, hyperbole and words without meaning that extreme web hustlers are fond of.
Before Jesus was just a rabi: a teacher. He was wise; he was poor; he was loving; he was special; he was on the verge of magical; he was anti-establishment; he was quiet; he was promoting a cause.
